




 













Litera – Document and Content Lifecycle Management Software – Litera

























































 













 Login










Litera
Document and Content Lifecycle Management Software – Litera















 








What is Litéra?


Documents are the currency of business; your content defines its value. Litéra’s content solutions protect reputation, manage risk and increase productivity, providing the control and mobility you need. We help you get the job done, on any device, anywhere.











What is Litéra?


Documents are the currency of business; your content defines its value. Litéra’s content solutions protect reputation, manage risk and increase productivity, providing the control and mobility you need. We help you get the job done, on any device, anywhere.



 















 











“Organizations, in any environment, where risk management and compliance is critical, and organizations which create complex legal contracts, submissions, and standard operating procedures, will benefit from Litéra’s products to collaborate, manage changes, and protect documents…”  






“Litéra offers one of the most robust document tool-sets we have seen. The bottom line is that (you) will complete more document processes in less time with less risk once Litera is enabled.”  






Litéra named as Top 20 risk management Solution provider as well as Top 100 Microsoft Solution Provider.  














Content is everything; ensure its integrity with Litéra!

 








What are you looking for?











 


Protect Reputation
A single inconsistency can have a profound impact.

 









 


Manage Risk
Enterprise class data control without hindering access and collaboration.

 









 


Increase Productivity
The tools you need to get the job done on any device.

 

















What’s in it
for you?

 






CIO

 






R&D

 






BI

 












IT

 






SALES

 






MARKETING

 






FINANCE

 


























































Contact us for more information

 








Litéra offers you solutions to answer
Inside Your Organization
Where is the document? How many locations? How many versions? Which repository is the document in? When was it copied, sent, and to whom? What changes were made? Who approved the changes? How complete is the project? Who is holding up the project?
Outside Your Organization
Who has custody of the document? Can you revoke custody or deny access? Is the file encrypted to deter cyber hackers? Was an iPad left in a taxi? Will the document reach your competitor’s inbox? Are you truly collaborating with partners, or just sharing files? Is the deal room secure?









 
Litéra® and Content Confidence® are registered trademarks of Litéra Corp. All other brand names, product names or trademarks belong to their respective holders.











































 













Change-Pro TDC – Litera








































































 Login










Litera
Document and Content Lifecycle Management Software – Litera



























Total Document Comparison for True Content Confidence®.
Instantly compare complex documents.










10.1 Update Includes Improved Native PDF Comparison.












 







Reduce Risk

 







Litéra is only product that compares EVERYTHING in a document.
Eliminate manual comparison and version creation.
Experience Content Confidence® that ALL changes have been found,
ensuring content quality and integrity.


 








“The bottom line is that attorneys, patent attorneys, contract managers, researchers,
and financial analysts will complete more document processes
in less time with less risk once Litéra is enabled.”
Mike Anderson, Aragon Research

 












User Benefits

 







Text and formatting elements.
Complex graphics and images.
Embedded Excel data, graphs and charts.
Corrupt documents.
Clipboard comparison.
Intelligent Table Comparison ignores structure, making
content changes apparent.
Optional OCR Module for comparison of scanned
documents.


 








Contact us for Enterprise Licensing

 












Organizational Benefits

 







Compare files, convert them to PDF, then email or share them.
Benefit from an accurate, comprehensive snapshot of content files across DMS, shared networks, and SharePoint.
At a glance, determine content file versions and when changes were made.
Mix and match content from multiple repositories.


 











Competitor














Litéra Change-Pro® TDC




















Communicate

Convert to PDF and/or .ZIP
Email original, modified and comparison (redline) in original format or pdf










Anywhere

Compare documents on tablets, phones and any other devices that don’t have Office with Change-Pro Server option
Compare documents directly from Outlook or your document management system (DMS)










Update

View the original, modified and redlined document simultaneously
Filter, sort, and search the change log to zero in on key changes. Accept/reject the changes individually or in groups to create a new
version of the spreadsheet
Audit trail and summary change report summarize alterations
between versions – providing complete history of presentations modifications over time














Litéra offers you solutions to answer
Inside Your Organization
Where is the document? How many locations? How many versions? Which repository is the document in? When was it copied, sent, and to whom? What changes were made? Who approved the changes? How complete is the project? Who is holding up the project?
Outside Your Organization
Who has custody of the document? Can you revoke custody or deny access? Is the file encrypted to deter cyber hackers? Was an iPad left in a taxi? Will the document reach your competitor’s inbox? Are you truly collaborating with partners, or just sharing files? Is the deal room secure?

 







Datasheet


 






Buy Now


 






Contact Us


 








Protected by one or more of the following US patents licensed from Litéra Technologies, LLC: 7,818,660, 8,136,031, 8,381,092, 8,732,181, 8,527,864, 8,471,781 and 9,047,258. Litéra®, Content Confidence®, and Change-Pro® are registered trademarks of Litéra Corp. All other brand names, product names or trademarks belong to their respective holders.








































 













Our Team – Litera








































































 Login










Litera
Document and Content Lifecycle Management Software – Litera





















Paul DomnickPresidentPaul Domnick joined Litéra®,  as President in May of 2014. He brings special knowledge about the utility of Litéra’s software products in managing risks in financial services.
Read more about Paul Domnick 







Raina MassandChief Commercial Officer
Raina Massand is a co-founder of Litéra® and currently serves on the board of the company. As Chief Commercial Officer, Raina’s responsibilities include driving strategy and growth across all our product lines within legal and corporate market segments.
Read more about Raina Massand 







Karen MassandManaging DirectorKaren Massand is a co-founder and board member of Litéra, with more than 23 years in the software and healthcare industries.  Previously Karen  was a founding executive of pharmaceutical software company Skila, where she held the top commercial and operational executive positions prior to the successful sale of the company.
Read more about Karen Massand 







Joy Heath RushVP of Client DevelopmentWith more than 32 years in legal technology, Joy brings to Litéra®,  a wealth of knowledge, a depth of passion, and a commitment to the success of the legal technology community.
Read more about Joy Heath Rush 







Simon DandyVice President of Research & DevelopmentSimon is the Vice President of Research & Development at Litéra. He is responsible for the global Research and Development operations. Simon’s key priority is to maintain the speed and quality of development by providing clarity and direction to our talented developers in the Ukraine, Philippines, Singapore and Vietnam.
Read more about Simon Dandy 







Ken ManfordSenior Director of Sales EngineeringAs the Senior Director of Sales Engineering, Ken is responsible for the leadership of a shared service for the Client Development and Research & Development teams; including prospect and client demonstrations, project management, training, sales engineering, and the smooth end-to- end implementation of Litéra’s suite of products.
Read more about Ken Manford 







Donovan AlexanderDirector of Sales Engineering Donovan has been an integral part of Litéra® for the past 9 years. As Director of Sales Engineering, Alexander’s responsibilities encompass all discussions centering around the technical engineering of Litéra products.
Read more about Donovan Alexander 







Nicholas MavianoDirector of Project Management  Nick brings over 18 years of IT project management and training experience to Litéra. He is the Director of Project Management for Litéra® and is responsible for the project management and implementation of our suite of products.
Read more about Nicholas Maviano 







Jeremy LeonardGeneral Counsel and Director of Business AffairsJeremy serves as Litéra’s General Counsel and Director of Business Affairs. In addition to having a management role in the business operations, he is in charge of all legal matters of the corporation.
Read more about Jeremy Leonard







Sherry KappelChief ConsultantSherry serves as Chief Consultant at Litéra, a role that has her leading and overseeing all global consulting efforts at the company. She is responsible for strategic advisory services, industry outreach, and client advocacy.
Read more about Sherry Kappel 







Dawn HudginsDirector of MarketingDawn brings more than 20 years of experience in marketing and communications to Litéra®. Dawn’s experience includes a variety of global roles in marketing, communications, leadership, key note speaking,  training, management development, and organizational development.
Read more about Dawn Hudgins 
E-mailLinkedin





US & Canadian Sales Team









Raina MassandChief Commercial Officer
Raina Massand is a co-founder of Litéra® and currently serves on the board of the company. As Chief Commercial Officer, Raina’s responsibilities include driving strategy and growth across all our product lines within legal and corporate market segments.
Read more about Raina Massand 







Joy Heath RushVP of Client DevelopmentWith more than 32 years in legal technology, Joy brings to Litéra®,  a wealth of knowledge, a depth of passion, and a commitment to the success of the legal technology community.
Read more about Joy Heath Rush 







Jill GoldsteinDirector of Business Development, Northeast USAJill joined Litéra in January, 2015 with over 30 years of experience developing the law firm & corporate legal market. She brings a broad range of legal, compliance & risk as well as eDiscovery experience to Litera.
Read more about Jill Goldstein 







Matt BennettAccount Executive As an Account Executive at Litéra, Matthew Bennet develops and facilitates client relationships throughout the entire Midwestern territory of the United States.
Read more about Matt Bennett 







Joel MartinJunior Account Executive Joel Martin is responsible for building and growing lasting client relationships at Litéra Corp as the Junior Account Executive for the South Eastern territory of the United States.
Read more about Joel Martin 









EMEA Sales Team









Richard WardDirector of Client Development, EMEARichard Ward is Litéra’s Commercial Representation for the EMEA region. He is responsible for overseeing the needs of Litéra clients and partners within his region, while seeking new client development opportunities.
Read more about Richard Ward 







Karren GrahamLegal Client Care ManagerKarren’s responsibilities span across several departments, ranging from client consultations and heading project management initiatives, to implementing and training users on Litera solutions. Karren works closely with Litera Clients such as but not limited to Clifford Chance, A&O and Freshfields.
Read more about Karren Graham 







James BloorImplementation SpecialistJames has over 15 years’ experience of working in legal IT in the UK. He started out in legal as an IT trainer, later moving into the roles of Business Analyst and Project Manager.
Read more about James Bloor 









India Sales Team









Pradeep Bhaskar MenonDirector of Business Development, IndiaPradeep Bhaskar Menon has been at the forefront of leading new technologies and establishing businesses in India. Pradeep leads Litera’s business in India and is currently our Director of Business Development, India.
Read more about Pradeep Bhaskar Menon 







Vinay BehlCustomer focused Associate DirectorVinay has more than 16 years of experience in Sales and Business Development.  With an engineering background and IT software skills, he is a natural when it comes to understanding new products.
Read more about Vinay Behl 







Neeraj KumarAssistant Manager for Customer coordinationKumar is the Assistant Manager for Customer coordination in Litera’s customer focused team. He has a Master’s Degree in Physics and brings a lot of experience in managing the back office and customer solutions.
Read more about Neeraj Kumar 







Ramneek KumarAssociate Director Sales EngineeringRamneek is an IT professional with 25 years of experience of running information technology driven businesses and has always been  developing solutions in consultation with his clients.
Read more about Ramneek Kumar 










Sanjay MalikCorporate Sales and Account ManagementAs an accomplished MBA, Sanjay brings 18 years of extensive knowledge and experience in various functions of Corporate Sales and Account Management.
Read more about Sanjay Malik










Hema AwasthiAs a Business Development professional, Hema brings 7 years of experience working in diverse professional fields.
Read more about Hema Awasthi














Litéra® is a registered trademark of Litéra Corp.  All other brand names, product names, or trademarks belong to their respective holders.









































 













Litéra LexPro – Litera








































































 Login










Litera
Document and Content Lifecycle Management Software – Litera



























Superior Definition Validation & Cross-Reference Checking

 










 




 




 




  



Litéra LexPro® simplifies the use of Defined Terms and Cross-Referencing in legal documents.
 
  As a simple Word add-in, it eliminates hours of manual review and reduces inaccuracies.

 












Draft Better
 Reduce Errors









The Review Definitions feature scans your document to identify all the
Defined Terms, Unused Terms, Uncapitalized Terms and Undefined Terms.
You have the ability to Add, Change, Delete or Sort, right from within the
review dialog box.
Creates and facilitates efficiency, consistency and accuracy – critical qualities
of a successful lawyer in today’s competitive legal arena.
Uses native Microsoft® Word Cross-referencing so nothing proprietary is
added to the document
























“Litéra offers one of the most robust document toolsets we have seen.”
Jim Lundy, Aragon Research













 














 






“Organizations in any environment where risk management and compliance is critical, will benefit from Litéra’s products.”

 








Product Features







Efficiently Navigate Definitions
Locating the definitions and continuously scrolling between the Defined Terms section and the body of the document can be a source of frustration.  Litéra LexPro® creates and facilitates efficiency, consistency, and accuracy—critical qualities of a successful lawyer in today’s competitive legal arena.


Convenient Pop-up Tools
Never scroll for a Defined Term again. Double click on any Defined Term in a legal document and its bespoke definition will appear instantly.


Detect Defined Terms With The Review Tool
The incorrect use of Defined Term conventions can cause serious problems of interpretation and construction. Litera LexPro® immediately detects: Defined Terms, Unused Terms, Uncapitalized Terms and Undefined Terms.

Instantly Edit Or Add Definitions
Defined Terms can be accessed and edited instantly without users getting lost in the document. Corresponding text in the Defined Terms section will be updated automatically. New terms can easily be added (into the glossary in alphabetical order).


Remove Unused Terms
Quickly find and remove terms that are defined but never used in the document. Remove individually, or all at the same time.


Highlighting Definitions
The highlight tool gives you the ability to highlight all the definitions in the entire document with a click of a button.


Superior Referencing Function
To reduce error and save immense drafting time, instantly insert Cross References without going through the frustrating process in Word.


Repair Cross References
With Ease
Clause references that have been broken are fixed in seconds, and clauses with no corresponding reference are highlighted.




 








Litéra offers you solutions to answer
Inside Your Organization
Where is the document? How many locations? How many versions? Which repository is the document in? When was it copied, sent, and to whom? What changes were made? Who approved the changes? How complete is the project? Who is holding up the project?
Outside Your Organization
Who has custody of the document? Can you revoke custody or deny access? Is the file encrypted to deter cyber hackers? Was an iPad left in a taxi? Will the document reach your competitor’s inbox? Are you truly collaborating with partners, or just sharing files? Is the deal room secure?

 







Datasheet


 






Buy Now


 






Contact Us


 








Litéra®, Content Confidence®, and Litéra LexPro® are registered trademarks of Litéra Corp. All other brand names, product names, or trademarks belong to their respective holders.

 






































 













Webinars and Podcasts – Litera








































































 Login










Litera
Document and Content Lifecycle Management Software – Litera















Webinars and PodcastsYou are here:HomeWebinars and Podcasts





















PAST WEBINAR AND PODCAST RECORDINGS














Litéra Webinars






Finding Your Security Suite Spot 
Wednesday, July 26th, 11:00 AM – 12:00 PM EDT




Collaboration on documents is an essential part of the business workflow, but one wrong move and an employee can inadvertently disclose sensitive information and ruin your company (or your client’s) reputation. Litéra’s security products can prevent this from occurring by making it easy for them to do the right thing. Join Simon Dandy, VP of R&D at Litéra, as he discusses how the products in our Security Suite work together to protect your content and your reputation.




Register Here






Podcasts








Tech Yourself Before You Wreck Yourself sponsored by Litéra, host Ben Zimmerman explores news, technology, and services that will help you improve your business and home office productivity. Our goal is to guide you in making the right technology choices.
Email, cloud repositories, and FTP are just a few ways to send or retrieve digital information, but how secure are these methods? Are they really the best ways to store and send your sensitive files? In recent years, cyber attacks on major email and cloud storage providers like Yahoo and DropBox compromised the accounts of billions of users. What do you need to do to ensure your most valuable files stay secure? Litéra Information Security Officer, Stuart James has the answer.






 





Litéra is a proud sponsor of Legal Talk Network’s Lawyer 2 Lawyer:
Lawyer 2 Lawyer is an award-winning podcast covering relevant, contemporary news from a legal perspective. Hosts Bob Ambrogi and J. Craig Williams invite industry professionals to examine current events and recent rulings in discussions that raise contemplative questions for those involved in the legal industry. Launched in 2005, Lawyer 2 Lawyer is one of the longest-running podcasts on the Internet.





 






































 













innova™ – Litera








































































 Login










Litera
Document and Content Lifecycle Management Software – Litera
























 


The Leading Document Automation Platform.

 










 




  








Reduce Risk
and
Increase
Productivity

 







Document standardization is an important part of building and maintaining your professional reputation. Consistently and correctly produce documents that must comply with complex regulations.
Start populating documents immediately without having to comb through and remove the content of the previous version. Easily create custom templates without writing a single line of code and share data and templates locally or globally.


 








Build your reputation by consistently producing quality documents.

 














 







Eliminate duplication and revision risks while enjoying lightning fast document creation with the consistent look and feel your clients expect.
Document automation like you’ve only imagined, until now.

 








Contact us for Enterprise Licensing

 
















User Simplicity

Easy-to-use dialogs guide users to create polished, standardized documents quickly
QuickFills and QuickDocs allows users to enter information once and recall it with one click
Generate multiple tables of contents for any document and save settings in QuickFills










Advanced Features

Manage all aspects of automatic paragraph numbering
DocID feature ensures document identification and offers flexibility with seven different positions and an unlimited number of layouts
QuickConvert allows for the conversion of any native Word document into an innova™ template-based maintaining the integrity and accuracy of the original
Create pleading templates for federal and state courts, ensuring document consistency and accuracy. innova™ includes pleading templates for all 50 states in the federal court system and 25 states in the state court system










Administrative Controls

Share data and templates globally
Manage users and update their templates automatically when they upgrade versions










Anywhere

innova integrates with all major DMSs and supports front-end profiling configuration common in Europe














Litéra offers you solutions to answer
Inside Your Organization
Where is the document? How many locations? How many versions? Which repository is the document in? When was it copied, sent, and to whom? What changes were made? Who approved the changes? How complete is the project? Who is holding up the project?
Outside Your Organization
Who has custody of the document? Can you revoke custody or deny access? Is the file encrypted to deter cyber hackers? Was an iPad left in a taxi? Will the document reach your competitor’s inbox? Are you truly collaborating with partners, or just sharing files? Is the deal room secure?

 















Datasheet


 






Contact Us


 
















Protected under US patents 8,381,104, 9105,007, and  7,818,678, licensed from Litéra Technologies, LLC.
innova™ is a trademark of Litéra® Corp. Litéra® is a registered trademark of Litéra Corp. All other brand names, product names,or trademarks belong to their respective holders.








































 













Technology – Litera









































































 Login










Litera
Document and Content Lifecycle Management Software – Litera















TechnologyYou are here:HomeAbout UsTechnology

















Litéra is regarded as a world leader in the development of content risk management software. Known for our innovative technology, we invest in excess of 30 percent of revenue into research and development, unprecedented in the industry. Litéra has attracted talent from the top leadership of Microsoft, law firms and technology consulting groups, as well as more than 40 best-in-class developers located in top software engineering locales around the globe.
Technology research and advisory firm Aragon Research named Litéra a “Hot Vendor” in content management, collaboration, and authoring, stating that users will complete more document processes in less time with less risk once Litéra is enabled. According to Aragon analysts, “Litéra offers one of the most robust document toolsets we have seen.”
Litéra protects its intellectual property and our customers’ investment with patented technology that serves as the engine and ingenuity of much of our product suite. With rights to seven awarded patents and several more that are pending, Litéra is poised to continue its growth in the content management lifecycle arena.
U.S. Patents 7,818,660 and 8,136,031
These patents protect technology in Change-Pro suite of products. Learn more about the Change-Pro suite.
U.S. Patent 7,818,678
This patent protects technology in Litéra IDS. Learn more about Litéra IDS
U.S. Patents 7,895,276 and 8,060,575
These patents protect technology in Metadact-e. Learn more about Metadact-e.
U.S. Patents 8,019,769 and 8,219,566
These patents protect technology in CitationWare. Learn more about CitationWare.

 
Patents-at-a-Glance:

Metadact-e is sold pursuant to a license from Litéra Technologies, LLC for U.S. Patent #’s 7,895,276 and 8,060,575
Change-Pro TDC, Change-Pro for Excel, and Change-Pro for PowerPoint are sold pursuant to a license from Litéra Technologies, LLC for U.S. Patent #’s 7,818,660 and 8,136,031L
Litéra IDS is sold pursuant to a license from Litéra Technologies, LLC for U.S. Patent # 7,818,678
CitationWare is protected by Litéra Corp.’s U.S. Patent #’s 8,019,769 and 8,219,566
Litéra®, Metadact®, Change-Pro®, LDF®, Litéra IDS® are registered trademarks of Litéra Corp.
Innova™ and CitationWare™ are trademarks of Litéra Corp.









































10-Q: LITERA GROUP INC - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

21,613
+100.26
+0.47%






Nasdaq

6,412
+1.37
+0.02%






S&P 500

2,477
+7.22
+0.29%









8:40 P.M. ET


                                  John McCain gives Trump a win, then gives Senate an earful
                                





 
8:20 P.M. ET


Updated
      PayPal earnings: Partnerships help, but are benefits already priced in?
                                





 
7:47 P.M. ET


Updated
      AMD puts Intel in the crosshairs with fast-and-cheap Threadripper chip
                                





 
7:39 P.M. ET


                                  AMD earnings give investors what they wanted, now it must deliver
                                





 
7:28 P.M. ET


Updated
      How about never? Avoid taking meetings with these troublesome co-workers 
                                





 
7:23 P.M. ET


                                  House passes bill hitting Russia with new sanctions
                                





 
7:04 P.M. ET


                                  WSJ Interview: Trump Doesn't Rule Out Firing Sessions
                                





 
7:01 P.M. ET


                                  Former Trump campaign chief Manafort strikes deal to avoid public testimony
                                





 
6:45 P.M. ET


Updated
      One depressing reason millions of people are locked out of the American Dream
                                





 
6:44 P.M. ET


Updated
      House votes to prevent disgruntled customers from being able to sue their bank
                                





 
6:03 P.M. ET


Updated
      This quant pro and card counter says gambling can make you a better investor
                                





 
6:01 P.M. ET


Updated
      Bitcoin, digital currencies retreat from records
                                





 
5:42 P.M. ET


                                  This is what it will take for bitcoin to become a legit currency 
                                





 
5:36 P.M. ET


Updated
      Emerging markets fund manager favors Bangladesh and Kenya, and avoids Korea and Taiwan
                                





 
5:35 P.M. ET


                                  USS Thunderbolt Fires Warning Shots at Iranian Vessel in Gulf
                                





 
5:32 P.M. ET


Updated
      Here’s one Trump fan who might make you some money
                                





 
5:29 P.M. ET


                                  Chegg shares sink after second-quarter loss 
                                





 
5:24 P.M. ET


                                  McCain Returns to Senate With Strong Comments on Health Care
                                





 
5:24 P.M. ET


                                  Universal Health Services shares drop on earnings, outlook
                                





 
5:15 P.M. ET


                                  Health-Care Debate Moves Forward in Senate
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-Q: LITERA GROUP INC
    








    By

Published: Aug 11, 2016 10:27 a.m. ET

Share


















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- Item 2. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations  Cautionary Statements  This Form 10-Q may contain "forward-looking statements," as that term is used in federal securities laws, about Litera Group, Inc.'s financial condition, results of operations and business. These statements include, among others:  o statements concerning the potential benefits that Litera Group, Inc. ("Litera", "we". "our", "us", the "Company", "management") may experience from its business activities and certain transactions it contemplates or has completed; and  o statements of Litera's expectations, beliefs, future plans and strategies, anticipated developments and other matters that are not historical facts. These statements may be made expressly in this Form 10-Q. You can find many of these statements by looking for words such as "believes," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "opines," or similar expressions used in this Form 10-Q. These forward-looking statements are subject to numerous assumptions, risks and uncertainties that may cause Litera's actual results to be materially different from any future results expressed or implied by Litera in those statements. The most important facts that could prevent Litera from achieving its stated goals include, but are not limited to, the following:  (a) volatility or decline of Litera's stock price;  (b) potential fluctuation of quarterly results;  (c) failure of Litera to earn revenues or profits;  (d) inadequate capital to continue or expand its business, and inability to raise additional capital or financing to implement its business plans;  (f) decline in demand for Litera's products and services;  (g) rapid adverse changes in markets;  litigation with or legal claims and allegations by outside parties against  (i) insufficient revenues to cover operating costs;  There is no assurance that Litera will be profitable, Litera may not be able to successfully develop, manage or market its products and services, Litera may not be able to attract or retain qualified executives and personnel, Litera may not be able to obtain customers for its products or services, additional dilution in outstanding stock ownership may be incurred due to the issuance of more shares, warrants and stock options, or the exercise of outstanding warrants and stock options, and other risks inherent in Litera's businesses.  Because the statements are subject to risks and uncertainties, actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Litera cautions you not to place undue reliance on the statements, which speak only as of the date of this Form 10-Q. The cautionary statements contained or referred to in this section should be considered in connection with any subsequent written or oral forward-looking statements that Litera or persons acting on its behalf may issue. Litera does not undertake any obligation to review or confirm analysts' expectations or estimates or to release publicly any revisions to any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this Form 10-Q, or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.  Table of Contents  Current Overview  Litera is currently an "emerging growth company" under the JOBS Act. A company loses its "emerging growth company" status on (i) the last day of the fiscal year during which it had total annual gross revenues of $1,000,000,000 or more;  Litera Group, Inc. was incorporated under the laws of the State of Nevada on June 1, 2015. We were formed for the purpose of providing products and services within the film and theater production industry. Our founder, Mr. Wade Gardner, was appointed CEO, President, Secretary, CFO, Treasurer and Director of the Company. The Board voted to seek capital to carry out our business plan. We received our initial funding of $20,100 through the sale of common stock to Mr. Gardner who purchased 10,500,000 shares of our Common Stock on June 5, 2015. Our principal executive offices are located at 5751 Buckingham Pkwy, Culver City, CA 90230, our telephone number is (424) 543-4066 and our fax number is (424) 543-5072.  Litera is a developmental stage corporation that is dedicated to the creation and commercialization of literary and dramatic products and services with the aim of achieving profitability and sustaining growth of our business. Our implemented plan of operation is the development of screenplays, stage plays, comedy sketch and skit scripts, short film scripts and other literary and dramatic works, as well as offer abridgment and adaptation services, within the theater and film production community.  The key to our success lies in the Company's ability to identify a niche in the entertainment production market and fill the unsatisfied demand. Litera will target independent film and theatrical producers and small and experimental production studios that constantly scout for fresh entertainment material to produce and distribute. To save time and money, indie producers and small studios do not outlay expenses associated with creation of a literary or dramatic work, but instead procure completed aspiring projects to produce or distribute from others. This is the market niche that Litera has focused on.  Since our inception, we have commenced our business operations, including developing products, preliminary marketing of the completed work, as well as closing the first sixteen sales of our projects for an aggregate of $52,500. The Company also has seven more finished products available for sale, as well as four more projects in advanced development status. We negotiate contract details for our products and services as an option or an outright sale basis. Currently, the Company secured all the resources and skills needed to create and market our products and services internally by utilizing our sole officer and director's creative writing abilities and his background within the film and theater entertainment. In the future, Litera may pursue additional avenues outside its own walls and look to outsource certain aspects of services and product development and engage playwrights/screenwriters for this purpose. We anticipate that, as the Company grows over the next sixteen months, pools of expertise will be acquired by recruiting within the film and theater production industry and by the use of creative and marketing consultants, which will allow Litera to expand its management team and add to the Board of Directors.  Our operations to date have been devoted primarily to startup and development activities and the production and sale of our initial projects as follows:  1. Incorporation of the Company;  2. Initial funding from our Founder;  3. Carrying out of our business plan;  4. Initial procurement of prospective clientele for our products and services.  5. Product development and securing our first sixteen sales.  Table of Contents  As an emerging company, we continually analyze our business plan and operations in the light of current trends within the theater and film entertainment, market conditions and developments. We intend to become a self-sustained operational entity. In order to generate revenues, the management will aim to maximize the Company's business value by creating competitive products and services, addressing market and competition, utilizing specific marketing strategies, and establishing growth strategy for our company.  OUR PRINCIPAL PRODUCTS AND SERVICES  The Company develops literary and dramatic works such as screenplays, stage plays, comedy sketch and skit scripts, short film scripts, etc. for theater/film production. On our clients' request we will also provide abridgment and adaptation services on any products they are interested in. Abridgment is a condensing of a creative work into a shorter form while maintaining the unity of the original. Adaptation is conversion of an original work to another genre or medium (e.g. a short film script into a stage play, etc.)  The process for creating a literary or dramatic work can be an arduous one. For each project we conduct a needs assessment to determine the trends in certain categories of theater and film entertainment that enjoy popularity at the time. The theater and cinema culture is cyclical in nature; every once in a while a certain vision, topic or genre becomes popular, and producers release films and performances that adhere to this style or genre until the current interest and demand fizzle down. Other genres then take over and the process runs full cycle again. For purposes of demand and marketability, choosing a trend/genre that is currently on the edge of popularity is vital, and this is why a proper needs assessment is essential. We consider it the most important aspect of the entire process.  Next, we determine the feasibility of making our product a success. We consider our product a success when it garnishes interest from prospective buyers and results in a sale or option contract. During our feasibility analysis we explore and analyze similar films and performances in a chosen category that were proven successful over time to identify the creative and commercial attributes that made them work in order to utilize them for our projects.  We then identify the audience who we intend to reach through our product. Knowing the audience is important because it determines the content that will appear in the writing, as it may vary greatly depending on the intended audience. Targeting the product at specific audience increases the chances of the product sparking interest from potential buyers, so we must determine the market we intend our product for and cater to this audience's expectations throughout our writing.  Further, we move to concept development. We identify an idea or a story within a genre that is popular or gaining in popularity based on our needs assessment analysis. This is considered a product's early development where a story outline is created. Once the story outline takes shape, writing, or actual creative development, begins. It is the most time-consuming part of the process during which a workable script is crafted from a story outline. This crucial phase includes developing the format, narrative (plot, characters, story lines) and dialogue; introducing conflict, climax and resolution; writing out scene-by-scene physical interaction, utilizing symbolism, etc. The drafts are then rewritten and polished numerous times until we believe they are ready to be marketed for sale, at which time a logline and synopsis to convey both the content and the tone of the completed work are prepared for prospective clients' review and consideration. Litera makes sure to prepare these carefully thought out and compelling to engage and excite a prospective client about the potential of the project.  All phases of our product development, marketing and sales are conducted exclusively by Mr. Gardner, who devotes full time to the Company's operations. To-date, no capital has been expensed for development of our works. Litera develops products "on spec" (i.e. non-commissioned) and advertises them directly to our target market. Mr. Gardner uses his numerous industry contacts and studio introductions that he has developed over course of his career in entertainment business as the starting point in our clientele building. Depending on the complexity of the project, it takes Mr. Gardner about 2-6 weeks to produce a product ready for marketing.  Table of Contents  TARGET MARKET AND OUR NICHE WITHIN  It is essential for the Company's success to identify a niche in the entertainment market and fill the unsatisfied demand. To select a niche in the entertainment market that Litera could cater to, the Company researched core groups of professionals within the large demographic entertainment community who have similar needs and interests that could be targeted with excellent results. All the research data was derived from available industry and marketing information accumulated by our sole officer and director and required no expenses. We were able to establish that, having weathered financial storms in the past decade, the dynamics within the entertainment industry encountered changes which resulted in an acute shortage of development capital for new projects both in film and theater. While major studios and production companies maintain control of the high-end of the market and the big movies and shows, the independent film and theatrical producers have proven themselves to be more efficient making low budget films and theater shows. To save time and money, indie producers and small studios do not outlay expenses associated with creation of a literary or dramatic work, but instead procure completed aspiring projects to produce or distribute from others. Litera will target independent film and theatrical producers and small and experimental production studios that constantly scout for new exciting projects to produce and distribute. This is the market niche that Litera has selected and will focus on.  COMPETITION, OUR COMPETITIVE STRATEGY AND METHODS OF COMPETITION  The film and theater production industry is highly competitive, and our Company faces competition ranging from large and well established film and theater production companies to thousands of small firms engaged in developing and producing play and screenplay options and other material in a similar manner as Litera and seeking to enter the industry.  Our competitive strategy is based on the facts that while Litera is at a significant disadvantage to more established competitors due to our lack of financial resources, scarcity of relationships within the film and theater production community and absence of major marketing tools, the barriers to entry into the industry are nevertheless relatively low. It takes skills, knowledge and contacts to develop and sell products and services similar to ours. The Company believes that Mr. Gardner's pre-existing industry connections, his experience and background may allow us to tap into the theater and film production industry with a certain level of credibility. We will aim to produce creatively unique projects to gain the competitive edge we need while watching closely for emerging trends in theater and cinema and demands of the audience.  The Company's primary method of competition is to market specifically to independent and experimental film makers and small theater production companies. To save time and money, indie producers and small studios do not outlay expenses associated with creation of a literary or dramatic work, and therefore, they rely on others to supply them with well-written material. We believe that since we have chosen this specific niche market, we will be able to target the right audience and cater to its demands.  MARKETING, MARKETING OBJECTIVES AND STRATEGIES  Litera markets its products and services directly to the theater and film production community, focusing specifically on independent film and theatrical producers and small and experimental production studios.  Our Marketing Objectives are as follows:  � Establishing and promoting our presence in our selected targeted market  � Creating and maintaining a media list of theater and film entertainment PR agencies and advertising firms contacts  � Building a network of theater and film industry professional relationships and referrals  Table of Contents  To promote and market our products and services, we may incorporate the following strategies:  � Establishing online presence by designing a corporate website reflecting products and scope of services offered. We will also engage in a search engine optimization campaign to improve visibility of our website and assist us with awareness for our products and services. Optimizing a website may involve editing its content and HTML and associated coding to both increase its relevance to specific keywords and to remove barriers to the indexing activities of search engines.  � Approaching our industry target market by email. The most basic method of contacting is a carefully thought out query letter, sent via email, which consists of a one-paragraph synopsis of a project, a bio, a logline, in standard business format. Focusing specifically on our selected target market community who have similar needs and interests may yield excellent results.  � Engaging a PR campaign to obtain publicity and increase visibility for our business.  � Participating in writers' conferences and pitch fests, as well as submitting completed scripts for selection to film and theater festivals. While winning a contest is obviously a good way to add value to the product, even entering in such competitions will result in getting exposure for our Company and in some cases in reviews.  Currently, Mr. Gardner promotes our products through many channels, including networking at local film and theater festivals and Internet sources, as well as expanding his personal professional relationships with small and experimental studios and independent producers. While Mr. Gardner has limited experience in developing and expanding a client base and marketing products to them, we anticipate that, as the Company grows over the next sixteen months, pools of expertise will be acquired by recruiting within the theater and film production industry and by the use of technical and marketing consultants, which will allow qualified individuals to join Mr. Gardner on our management team and Board of Directors.  Currently, Litera does not have any existing relationships with PR agents, publicists, producers or producer's agents.  RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT  The Company has not expended funds for research and development costs since inception. Other than utilizing Mr. Gardner's experiences and available industry and marketing information, Litera has not undertaken any research and development activities regarding our target market and marketability of our products.  THEATRICAL AND FILM PRODUCTION INDUSTRY  The major business centers of film and theatrical production are concentrated in the United States, Europe, India and China. The theatrical and film production industry consists of the technological and commercial institutions that are involved in creation of a film or stage performance, such as: production companies, studios, cinematography, choreography, production, screen/playwriting, pre-production, post production, film and theater festivals, actors, dancers, singers, film and theatrical producers, directors and other personnel. Due to the great expense required to produce a movie or a stage play, the making of a film or a performance usually has to be done in conjunction with an already established production company. However, the production of independent films and small scale stage performances has begun to evolve with the advent of more affordable equipment and more sophisticated consumer technology, as well as the increasing visibility of independent festivals such as Sundance Film Festival or Contemporary American Theater Festival. Independent projects are often described as less commercially-driven art forms which differ significantly from the norms of plot-driven, mainstream classical Hollywood cinema or Broadway theater. Catering specifically to the needs of independent film and theatrical producers and small and experimental production studios is the focus of the Company's business.  Table of Contents  OUR SIGNIFICANT EMPLOYEE  We currently have one employee, Mr. Gardner who is our founder and serves as our sole officer and director. Mr. Gardner currently devotes full time to our business and is responsible for our daily operations including product development, sales and marketing, fund raising, implementation of our general strategy and execution of our business plan.  Our future business and operating results depend significantly on the continued contributions and active participation of Mr. Gardner. This individual would be difficult or impossible to replace. The loss of this key contributor, or his failure to perform, could materially and adversely affect our Company's operations. While we may obtain Key Man insurance, such insurance may not be sufficient to cover the loss incurred in the event this executive officer is lost.  Currently, our officer and director receives no compensation for his services during the development stage of our business operations. He is reimbursed for any out-of-pocket expenses he may incur on our behalf. In the future, we may approve payment of salaries for officers and directors, but currently, no such plans have been approved. We anticipate adding two (2) employees over the next sixteen (12) months, one of which will be a screen/play writer. We do not have any employment agreements in place with our officer and director. We also do not currently have any benefits, such as health or life insurance, available to our employee.  Critical Accounting Policies  Our discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations are based upon our financial statements, which have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. The preparation of these financial statements requires us to make estimates and judgments that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses, and related disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities. We monitor our estimates on an on-going basis for changes in facts and circumstances, and material changes in these estimates could occur in the future. Changes in estimates are recorded in the period in which they become known. We base our estimates on historical experience and other assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the circumstances. Actual results may differ from our estimates if past experience or other assumptions do not turn out to be substantially accurate.  Certain of our accounting policies are particularly important to the portrayal and understanding of our financial position and results of operations and require us to apply significant judgment in their application. As a result, these policies are subject to an inherent degree of uncertainty. In applying these policies, we use our judgment in making certain assumption and estimates. Our critical accounting policies are outlined in Note 1 in the Notes to the Financial Statements  Results of Operations for the six months ended June 30, 2016  We had $28,000 in revenues in the six months ended June 30, 2016. Our revenue is a result of the sale of literary and dramatic products. We anticipate a continued trend of literary and dramatic product sales revenue as we continue to develop such products. Our operating expenses were $52,785, which consisted of professional fees of $32,360 and general and administrative expenses of $20,425. Our operating expenses are primarily due to one-time expenses related to DTC application and OTCQB certification, as well as normal business operations. Our net loss was $24,785.  Liquidity and Capital Resources  The Company's cash position was $36,117 at June 30, 2016. As of June 30, 2016, the Company had current assets of $36,117 and current liabilities of $0 compared to $0 and $0, respectively, as of June 30, 2015, as we had yet to commence operations. This resulted in a working capital of $36,117 at June 30, 2016.  Table of Contents  Net cash used in operating activities amounted to $25,456 for the six months ended June 30, 2016. This is primarily due to general operating expenses.  Net cash used in investing activities amounted to $0 for the six months ended June 30, 2016.  Net cash provided by financing activities amounted to $0 for the six months ended June 30, 2016.  The Company does not have sufficient capital to meet its current cash needs, which include the costs of compliance with the continuing reporting requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. The Company intends to seek additional capital through the sale literary and dramatic products. Financing options may be available to the Company either via a private placement or through the public sale of stock. There is no assurance, however, that the available funds will be available or adequate. Its need for additional financing is likely to persist.  Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements  We have no off-balance sheet arrangements.  Aug 11, 2016  (c) 1995-2016 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch




















Most Popular





The biggest dog in the Dow might soon break free





Here’s why Amazon, Facebook and the gang are not going to take down this market





AMD earnings: How did we get here?





S&P 500, Nasdaq finish at records as investors cheer earnings





Russell Gordy's Ranch Collection Across the American West




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 






















MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



Credit


Currency


Markets


Supermarkets


Textiles


Gas Prices




Airlines


Oil


Currencies


U.S. Stocks


Retail


Federal Reserve




U.S. Dollar


United Kingdom


Europe


European Markets


Energy Stocks


Copper






People in the news



Trump, Donald


Buffett, Warren


Hill, David


Rather, Dan


Brin, Sergey


King, David




Lewis, Michael


Perry, Rick


Berlusconi, Silvio


McCain, John


Musk, Elon


Carter, Jimmy




Obama, Barack


Clinton, Bill


Jackson, Michael


Bloomberg, Michael


Putin, Vladimir


Snow, John






Companies in the news



Miners


Connor


American International Group


Lilly (Eli) & Co.


Dow Chemical


DuPont




Apple Inc.


American Manufacturing


Ford Motor


General Motors


Jones


3M Co




Bank of America Corp.


Caterpillar Inc.


Dow Jones & Co.


Google Inc.


McDonald's Corp.


News Corp.






Organizations in the news



European Union


Consumers Union


General Assembly


Small Business Administration


European Central Bank


Nasdaq Stock Market




World Bank


World Trade Organization


Bank of England


Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Investment Company Institute


New York Stock Exchange




College Board


New York University


State University of New York


University of Massachusetts


University of Washington


Washington State University












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




9:04 PM EDT
July 25, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
8:41pJohn McCain gives Trump a win, then gives Senate an earful
8:20pPayPal earnings: Partnerships help, but are benefits already priced in?
7:47pAMD puts Intel in the crosshairs with fast-and-cheap Threadripper chip
7:40pAMD earnings give investors what they wanted, now it must deliver
7:29pHow about never? Avoid taking meetings with these troublesome co-workers 
7:23pHouse passes bill hitting Russia with new sanctions
7:04pWSJ Interview: Trump Doesn't Rule Out Firing Sessions
7:01pFormer Trump campaign chief Manafort strikes deal to avoid public testimony
6:46pOne depressing reason millions of people are locked out of the American Dream
6:45pHouse votes to prevent disgruntled customers from being able to sue their bank
6:04pThis quant pro and card counter says gambling can make you a better investor
6:01pBitcoin, digital currencies retreat from records
5:43pThis is what it will take for bitcoin to become a legit currency 
5:37pEmerging markets fund manager favors Bangladesh and Kenya, and avoids Korea and Taiwan
5:35pUSS Thunderbolt Fires Warning Shots at Iranian Vessel in Gulf
5:32pHere’s one Trump fan who might make you some money
5:30pChegg shares sink after second-quarter loss 
5:24pMcCain Returns to Senate With Strong Comments on Health Care
5:24pUniversal Health Services shares drop on earnings, outlook
5:15pHealth-Care Debate Moves Forward in Senate
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,613.43

+100.26
+0.47%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,412.17

+1.37
+0.02%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.13

+7.22
+0.29%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































LITERA GROUP Inc. 5751 Buckingham Pkwy Culver City, CA Management Services - MapQuest







































































































    LITERA GROUP Inc.
  

5751 Buckingham Pkwy

Culver City
CA
90230




 Reviews



(424) 543-4066
Website

        Menu & Reservations
      



            Make Reservations 




            Order Online
          

            Tickets
          




          Tickets
        


        See Availability
      





      Nearby
    


      Directions
    


    {{::location.tagLine.value.text}}
  



Sponsored Topics








































See a problem?
Let us know!






















Legal






Help





















First Foods Group, Inc. 10-Q Nov  9 2016 | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»First Foods Group, Inc. (FIFG)FORM 10-Q | Quarterly ReportNov  9 2016|About: First Foods Group, Inc. (FIFG)View as PDF

 Litera Group Inc (Form: 10-Q, Received: 11/09/2016 06:06:42) 

















	 




	UNITED STATES






	SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION






	WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549




	 




	FORM 10-Q




	 


	(Mark One)


	 



	x

	QUARTERLY REPORT UNDER SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934


	 


	For Quarterly Period Ended

	September 30, 2016



	or


	 



	¨

	TRANSITION REPORT UNDER SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934


	 


	For the Transition period from _______________ to ______________


	 


	Commission File Number:

	333-206260



	 









	LITERA GROUP, INC.








	(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)




	 







	NEVADA





	 





	47-4145514







	(State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization)




	 




	(I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)





	 










	5751 Buckingham Pkwy





	Culver City, CA 90230








	(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)






	 








	(424) 543-4066








	Registrant's telephone number, including area code





	 





	____________________________________________________________






	(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)




	 

	Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the proceeding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes

	¨

	No

	x



	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, or a smaller reporting company. See definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer” and “smaller reporting company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check One).


	 







	Large accelerated filer





	¨





	Accelerated filer





	¨







	Non-accelerated filer





	¨





	Smaller reporting company





	x







	(Do not check if a smaller reporting company)




	 




	 





	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes

	¨

	No

	x



	 


	Indicate the number of shares outstanding of each of the issuer’s classes of common stock as of the latest practicable date.


	 


	As of November 8, 2016, the number of shares outstanding of the registrant’s class of common stock was 14,150,000.


	 








	 






	 




	 













	 







	 



	TABLE OF CONTENTS



	 











	 





	Pages








	 







	 










	PART I.


	FINANCIAL INFORMATION






	 




	 







	 







	 









	Item 1.






	Financial Statements





	 




	3







	 













	 





	Balance Sheets at September 30, 2016 (Unaudited)





	 




	5







	 













	 





	Statements of Operations for the three and nine months ended September 30, 2016 (Unaudited)





	 




	6







	 













	 





	Statements of Cash Flows for the nine months ended September 30, 2016 (Unaudited)





	 




	7







	 













	 





	Notes to Financial Statements





	 




	8







	 







	 









	Item 2.






	Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations





	 




	11







	 







	 









	Item 3.






	Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk





	 




	17







	 







	 









	Item 4.






	Controls and Procedures





	 




	17







	 







	 










	PART II.


	OTHER INFORMATION






	 




	 







	 







	 









	Item 1.






	Legal Proceedings





	 




	18







	 







	 









	Item 2.






	Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities and Use of Proceeds





	 




	18







	 







	 









	Item 3.






	Defaults Upon Senior Securities





	 




	18







	 







	 









	Item 4.






	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders





	 




	18







	 







	 









	Item 5.






	Other Information





	 




	18







	 







	 









	Item 6.






	Exhibits





	 




	19







	 







	 










	SIGNATURES






	 




	20







	 




	 




	2













	 




	 






	PART I. FINANCIAL INFORMATION




	 






	Item 1. Financial Statements





	 




	LITERA GROUP, INC.




	 




	FINANCIAL STATEMENTS and




	REPORT OF INDEPENDENT CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANTS




	 




	Period Ended September 30, 2016




	 





	 




	3














	Table of Contents






	 





	LITERA GROUP, INC.




	 





	TABLE OF CONTENTS




	 







	FINANCIAL STATEMENTS:




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 







	Balance Sheets





	 




	5




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 







	Statements of Operations





	 




	6




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 







	Statements of Cash Flows





	 




	7




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 







	Notes to Financial Statements





	 




	8




	 






	 






	 




	4













	 




	 










	LITERA GROUP, INC.








	Balance

	 

	Sheets








	 






	 




	 





	September 30,






	 






	 






	December 31,






	 








	 






	 






	2016






	 






	 






	2015






	 








	 






	 






	(Unaudited)






	 






	 




	 



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 







	ASSETS







	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	CURRENT ASSETS



	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Cash




	 




	 



	23,824



	 




	 




	 



	61,573



	 






	Accounts receivable




	 



	$


	3,500



	 




	 



	$


	-



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Total Current Assets




	 




	 



	27,324



	 




	 




	 



	61,573



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	TOTAL ASSETS




	 



	$


	27,324



	 




	 



	$


	61,573



	 







	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 









	LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' DEFICIT







	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	CURRENT LIABILITIES



	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Accrued liabilities




	 



	$


	-



	 




	 



	$


	671



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Total Current Liabilities




	 




	 



	-



	 




	 




	 



	671



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	TOTAL LIABILITIES




	 




	 



	-



	 




	 




	 



	671



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	STOCKHOLDERS' DEFICIT



	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Preferred stock; $0.001 par value, 5,000,000 shares authorized, no shares issued or outstanding




	 




	 



	-



	 




	 




	 



	-



	 






	Common stock; $0.001 par value, 70,000,000 shares authorized, 14,150,000 issued and outstanding




	 




	 



	14,150



	 




	 




	 



	14,150



	 






	Additional paid-in capital




	 




	 



	42,949



	 




	 




	 



	42,949



	 






	Deficit accumulated during the development stage




	 




	 



	(29,775


	)



	 




	 



	3,803



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Total Stockholders' Deficit




	 




	 



	27,324



	 




	 




	 



	60,902



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	TOTAL LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS' DEFICIT




	 



	$


	27,324



	 




	 



	$


	61,573



	 






	 


	The accompanying notes are an integral part of these condensed financial statements.


	 






	 




	5














	Table of Contents





	 










	LITERA GROUP, INC.








	Statements

	of

	Operations









	(Unaudited)







	 






	 




	 





	For the Three Months Ended






	 






	 






	For the Nine Months Ended






	 








	 






	 






	September 30,






	 






	 






	September 30,






	 








	 






	 






	2016






	 






	 






	2015






	 






	 






	2016






	 






	 






	2015





	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	REVENUES



	 



	$


	10,000



	 




	 



	$


	13,500



	 




	 



	$


	38,000



	 




	 



	$


	13,500



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	EXPENSES



	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Professional Fees




	 




	 



	6,344



	 




	 




	 



	9,635



	 




	 




	 



	38,704



	 




	 




	 



	9,635



	 






	General and administrative




	 




	 



	12,449



	 




	 




	 



	884



	 




	 




	 



	32,874



	 




	 




	 



	1,383



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	LOSS FROM OPERATIONS



	 




	 



	(8,793


	)



	 




	 



	2,981



	 




	 




	 



	(33,578


	)



	 




	 



	2,482



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	NET INCOME (LOSS)



	 



	$


	(8,793


	)



	 



	$


	2,981



	 




	 



	$


	(33,578


	)



	 



	$


	2,482



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	BASIC AND DILUTED LOSS PER SHARE OF COMMON STOCK



	 



	$


	(0.00


	)



	 



	$


	0.00



	 




	 



	$


	(0.00


	)



	 



	$


	0.00



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	WEIGHTED AVERAGE NUMBER OF SHARES OUTSTANDING



	 




	 



	14,150,000



	 




	 




	 



	14,150,000



	 




	 




	 



	14,150,000



	 




	 




	 



	14,150,000



	 






	 


	The accompanying notes are an integral part of these condensed financial statements.


	 






	 




	6














	Table of Contents





	 










	LITERA GROUP, INC.








	Statements of

	 

	Cash Flows









	(Unaudited)







	 






	 




	 





	For the Nine Months Ended






	 








	 






	 






	September 30,






	 








	 






	 






	2016






	 






	 






	2015





	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	OPERATING ACTIVITIES



	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Net loss




	 



	$


	(33,578


	)



	 



	$


	2,482



	 






	Adjustments to reconcile net loss to cash flows from operating activities




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Services contributed by shareholder




	 




	 



	-



	 




	 




	 



	499



	 






	Changes in operating assets and liabilities




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Accounts receivable




	 




	 



	(3,500


	)



	 




	 



	-



	 






	Accrued expenses




	 




	 



	(671


	)



	 




	 



	-



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Net Cash Provided by (Used in) Operating Activities




	 




	 



	(37,749


	)



	 




	 



	2,981



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	INVESTING ACTIVITIES



	 




	 



	-



	 




	 




	 



	-



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	FINANCING ACTIVITIES



	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Common stock issued for cash




	 




	 



	-



	 




	 




	 



	20,100



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Net Cash Provided by (Used in) Financing Activities




	 




	 



	-



	 




	 




	 



	20,100



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	NET CHANGE IN CASH



	 




	 



	(37,749


	)



	 




	 



	23,081



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	CASH AT BEGINNING OF PERIOD



	 




	 



	61,573



	 




	 




	 



	-



	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	CASH AT END OF PERIOD



	 



	$


	23,824



	 




	 



	$


	23,081



	 







	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	SUPPLEMENTAL CASH FLOW INFORMATION:



	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	NON-CASH FINANCING ACTIVITIES:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	CASH PAID FOR:




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Interest




	 



	$


	-



	 




	 



	$


	-



	 






	Income Taxes




	 



	$


	-



	 




	 



	$


	-



	 





	 


	The accompanying notes are an integral part of these condensed financial statements.


	 






	 




	7














	Table of Contents





	 



	LITERA GROUP, INC.







	Notes to the




	 Condensed

	 

	Financial Statements





	September 30, 2016



	 



	NOTE 1 - SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES



	 



	Nature of Business



	 


	Litera Group, Inc. ("Litera", or the "Company") was incorporated under the laws of the State of Nevada on June 1, 2015. Litera is a developmental stage corporation formed to provide products and services within the theater and film production industry. The Company develops screenplays, stage plays, comedy sketch and skit scripts, short film scripts and other literary and dramatic works, as well as offer abridgment and adaptation services. The Company's target market is independent film and theatrical producers and small and experimental production studios that scout for new projects to produce and distribute.


	 



	Going Concern



	 


	The Company's financial statements are prepared using generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America applicable to a going concern which contemplates the realization of assets and liquidation of liabilities in the normal course of business. The Company has not yet established an ongoing source of revenues sufficient to cover its operating costs and allow it to continue as a going concern. The ability of the Company to continue as a going concern is dependent on the Company obtaining adequate capital to fund operating losses until it becomes profitable. If the Company is unable to obtain adequate capital, it could be forced to cease operations.


	 


	In order to continue as a going concern, the Company will need, among other things, additional capital resources. Management's plan is to obtain such resources for the Company by obtaining capital from management and significant shareholders sufficient to meet its minimal operating expenses and seeking equity and/or debt financing. However management cannot provide any assurances that the Company will be successful in accomplishing any of its plans.


	 


	The ability of the Company to continue as a going concern is dependent upon its ability to successfully accomplish the plans described in the preceding paragraph and eventually secure other sources of financing and attain profitable operations. The accompanying financial statements do not include any adjustments that might be necessary if the Company is unable to continue as a going concern.


	 



	Use of Estimates



	 


	The preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those estimates.


	 



	Basis of Presentation



	 


	The Company's financial statements are presented in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America. The Company's fiscal year end is December 31.


	 



	Cash and Cash Equivalents



	 


	The Company considers all highly liquid instruments purchased with a maturity of three months or less to be cash equivalents to the extent the funds are not being held for investment purposes.


	 




	 




	8














	Table of Contents





	 



	LITERA GROUP, INC.




	Notes to the


	 Condensed Financial Statements




	September 30, 2016



	 



	NOTE 1 - SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES (CONTINUED)



	 



	Revenue Recognition



	 


	The Company will generate revenues from the sale of play and screenplay scripts. Revenues are recognized when the following conditions are met:


	 







	 




	1.




	Persuasive evidence of a sale or license agreement exists with a customer














	 




	2.




	The script is complete and has been delivered or is immediately available to be delivered in accordance with the terms of the agreement.














	 




	3.




	The license period for the arrangement has started and the customer can begin exploitation, exhibition or sale.














	 




	4.




	The arrangement fee is fixed or determinable














	 




	5.




	Collection of the arrangement fee is reasonably assured.





	 


	If any of the above conditions are not met, the Company will defer revenue until all conditions are met.


	 



	Income Taxes



	 


	The Company provides for income taxes using an asset and liability approach. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are recorded based on the differences between the financial statement and tax bases of assets and liabilities and the tax rates in effect when these differences are expected to reverse. Deferred tax assets are reduced by a valuation allowance if, based on the weight of available evidence, it is more likely than not that some or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized.


	 



	Per Share Data



	 


	In accordance with "ASC-260 - Earnings per Share", the basic loss per common share is computed by dividing net loss available to common stockholders by the weighted average number of common shares outstanding. Diluted loss per common share is computed similar to basic loss per common share except that the denominator is increased to include the number of additional common shares that would have been outstanding if the potential common shares had been issued and if the additional common shares were dilutive. At September 30, 2016, the Company had no stock equivalents that were anti-dilutive and excluded in the loss per share computation


	 



	Fair Value of Financial Instruments



	 


	Fair value estimates of financial instruments are made at a specific point in time, based on relevant information about financial markets and specific financial instruments. As these estimates are subjective in nature, involving uncertainties and matters of significant judgment, they cannot be determined with precision. Changes in assumptions can significantly affect estimated fair value. The carrying value of cash and cash equivalents and accounts payable and accrued liabilities approximate their fair value because of the short-term nature of these instruments. Management is of the opinion that the Company is not exposed to significant market or credit risks arising from these financial instruments.


	 




	 




	9














	Table of Contents





	 



	LITERA GROUP, INC.




	Notes to the


	 Condensed Financial Statements




	September 30, 2016



	 



	NOTE 1 - SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES (CONTINUED)



	 



	Stock Based Compensation



	 


	The Company accounts for stock-based compensation to employees in accordance with FASB ASC 718. Stock-based compensation to employees is measured at the grant date, based on the fair value of the award, and is recognized as expense over the requisite employee service period. The Company accounts for stock-based compensation to other than employees in accordance with FASB ASC 505-50. Equity instruments issued to other than employees are valued at the earlier of a commitment date or upon completion of the services, based on the fair value of the equity instruments and is recognized as expense over the service period. The Company estimates the fair value of stock-based payments using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model for common stock and warrants and the closing price of the Company's common stock for common share issuances.


	 



	Long Lived Assets



	 


	The Company follows the provisions of ASC 360 for its long-lived assets. The Company's long-lived assets, which include rights/ownership of undeveloped film scripts, are reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset may not be recoverable.


	 


	The Company assesses the recoverability of its long-lived assets by comparing the projected undiscounted net cash flows associated with the related long-lived asset or group of long-lived assets over their remaining estimated useful lives against their respective carrying amounts. Impairment, if any, is based on the excess of the carrying amount over the fair value of those assets. Fair value is generally determined using the asset's expected future discounted cash flows or market value, if readily determinable. If long-lived assets are determined to be recoverable, but the newly determined remaining estimated useful lives are shorter than originally estimated, the net book values of the long-lived assets are depreciated over the newly determined remaining estimated useful lives.


	 



	Recent Accounting Pronouncements



	 


	The Company has evaluated recent accounting pronouncements and their adoption has not had or is not expected to have a material impact on the Company's financial position or statements.


	 



	NOTE 2 - STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY



	 


	During 2015, the Company issued 10,500,000 shares of common stock to the founder of the Company in exchange for cash of $20,100 and expenses of $499, and 3,650,000 shares of common stock to various unrelated parties for cash at $0.01 per share, the aggregate cash proceeds from this issuance totaled $36,500.


	 





	NOTE 3 - SUBSEQUENT EVENTS



	 


	In accordance with ASC 855-10 Company management reviewed all material events through the date of this report and determined that there are no material subsequent events to report.


	 






	 




	10














	Table of Contents








	 






	Item 2. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations




	 



	Cautionary Statements



	 


	This Form 10-Q may contain "forward-looking statements," as that term is used in federal securities laws, about Litera Group, Inc.'s financial condition, results of operations and business. These statements include, among others:


	 








	·





	statements concerning the potential benefits that Litera Group, Inc. (“Litera”, “we”. “our”, “us”, the “Company”, “management”) may experience from its business activities and certain transactions it contemplates or has completed; and






	 




	 







	·





	statements of Litera's expectations, beliefs, future plans and strategies, anticipated developments and other matters that are not historical facts. These statements may be made expressly in this Form 10-Q. You can find many of these statements by looking for words such as "believes," "expects," "anticipates," "estimates," "opines," or similar expressions used in this Form 10-Q. These forward-looking statements are subject to numerous assumptions, risks and uncertainties that may cause Litera's actual results to be materially different from any future results expressed or implied by Litera in those statements. The most important facts that could prevent Litera from achieving its stated goals include, but are not limited to, the following:





	 







	 




	(a)




	volatility or decline of Litera's stock price;






	 




	 




	 






	 




	(b)




	potential fluctuation of quarterly results;






	 




	 




	 






	 




	(c)




	failure of Litera to earn revenues or profits;






	 




	 




	 






	 




	(d)




	inadequate capital to continue or expand its business, and inability to raise additional capital or financing to implement its business plans;






	 




	 




	 






	 




	(f)




	decline in demand for Litera's products and services;






	 




	 




	 






	 




	(g)




	rapid adverse changes in markets;






	 




	 




	 






	 




	(h)




	litigation with or legal claims and allegations by outside parties against Litera, including but not limited to challenges to Litera's intellectual property rights;






	 




	 




	 






	 




	(i)




	insufficient revenues to cover operating costs;





	 


	There is no assurance that Litera will be profitable, Litera may not be able to successfully develop, manage or market its products and services, Litera may not be able to attract or retain qualified executives and personnel, Litera may not be able to obtain customers for its products or services, additional dilution in outstanding stock ownership may be incurred due to the issuance of more shares, warrants and stock options, or the exercise of outstanding warrants and stock options, and other risks inherent in Litera's businesses.


	 


	Because the statements are subject to risks and uncertainties, actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Litera cautions you not to place undue reliance on the statements, which speak only as of the date of this Form 10-Q. The cautionary statements contained or referred to in this section should be considered in connection with any subsequent written or oral forward-looking statements that Litera or persons acting on its behalf may issue. Litera does not undertake any obligation to review or confirm analysts' expectations or estimates or to release publicly any revisions to any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this Form 10-Q, or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events.


	 




	 




	11














	Table of Contents





	 



	Current Overview



	 


	Litera is currently an “emerging growth company” under the JOBS Act. A company loses its “emerging growth company” status on (i) the last day of the fiscal year during which it had total annual gross revenues of $1,000,000,000 or more; (ii) the last day of the fiscal year following the fifth anniversary of the date of its first sale of common equity securities pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”); (iii) the date on which it has, during the previous 3-year period, issued more than $1,000,000,000 in non-convertible debt; or (iv) the date on which it is deemed to be a ‘large accelerated filer’, as defined in section 240.12b– 2 of title 17, Code of Federal Regulations, or any successor thereto. As an “emerging growth company,” Litera is exempt from certain obligations of the Exchange Act including those found in Section 14A(a) and (b) related to shareholder approval of executive compensation and golden parachute compensation and Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 related to the requirement that management assess the effectiveness of the company’s internal control for financial reporting. Furthermore, Section 103 of the JOBS Act provides that as an “emerging growth company”, Litera is not required to comply with the requirement to provide an auditor’s attestation of ICFR under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act for as long as Litera qualifies as an “emerging growth company.” However, an “emerging growth company” is not exempt from the requirement to perform management’s assessment of internal control over financial reporting.


	 


	Litera Group, Inc. was incorporated under the laws of the State of Nevada on June 1, 2015. We were formed for the purpose of providing products and services within the film and theater production industry. Our founder, Mr. Wade Gardner, was appointed CEO, President, Secretary, CFO, Treasurer and Director of the Company. The Board voted to seek capital to carry out our business plan. We received our initial funding of $20,100 through the sale of common stock to Mr. Gardner who purchased 10,500,000 shares of our Common Stock on June 5, 2015. Our principal executive offices are located at 5751 Buckingham Pkwy, Culver City, CA 90230, our telephone number is (424) 543-4066 and our fax number is (424) 543-5072.


	 


	Litera is a developmental stage corporation that is dedicated to the creation and commercialization of literary and dramatic products and services with the aim of achieving profitability and sustaining growth of our business. Our implemented plan of operation is the development of screenplays, stage plays, comedy sketch and skit scripts, short film scripts and other literary and dramatic works, as well as offer abridgment and adaptation services, within the theater and film production community.


	 


	The key to our success lies in the Company’s ability to identify a niche in the entertainment production market and fill the unsatisfied demand. Litera will target independent film and theatrical producers and small and experimental production studios that constantly scout for fresh entertainment material to produce and distribute. To save time and money, indie producers and small studios do not outlay expenses associated with creation of a literary or dramatic work, but instead procure completed aspiring projects to produce or distribute from others. This is the market niche that Litera has focused on.


	 


	Since our inception, we have commenced our business operations, including developing products, preliminary marketing of the completed work, as well as closing the first nineteen sales of our projects for an aggregate of $62,500. The Company also has two more finished products available for sale, as well as one more project in advanced development status. We negotiate contract details for our products and services as an option or an outright sale basis. Currently, the Company secured all the resources and skills needed to create and market our products and services internally by utilizing our sole officer and director’s creative writing abilities and his background within the film and theater entertainment. In the future, Litera may pursue additional avenues outside its own walls and look to outsource certain aspects of services and product development and engage playwrights/screenwriters for this purpose. We anticipate that, as the Company grows over the next twelve months, pools of expertise will be acquired by recruiting within the film and theater production industry and by the use of creative and marketing consultants, which will allow Litera to expand its management team and add to the Board of Directors.


	 


	Our operations to date have been devoted primarily to startup and development activities and the production and sale of our initial projects as follows:


	 







	 



	1.


	Incorporation of the Company;





	 




	 




	 






	 



	2.


	Initial funding from our Founder;





	 




	 




	 






	 



	3.


	Carrying out of our business plan;





	 




	 




	 






	 



	4.


	Initial procurement of prospective clientele for our products and services.





	 




	 




	 






	 



	5.


	Product development and securing our first sales.




	 




	 




	12














	Table of Contents





	 


	As an emerging company, we continually analyze our business plan and operations in the light of current trends within the theater and film entertainment, market conditions and developments. We intend to become a self-sustained operational entity. In order to generate revenues, the management will aim to maximize the Company’s business value by creating competitive products and services, addressing market and competition, utilizing specific marketing strategies, and establishing growth strategy for our company.


	 



	OUR PRINCIPAL PRODUCTS AND SERVICES



	 


	The Company develops literary and dramatic works such as screenplays, stage plays, comedy sketch and skit scripts, short film scripts, etc. for theater/film production. On our clients' request we will also provide abridgment and adaptation services on any products they are interested in. Abridgment is a condensing of a creative work into a shorter form while maintaining the unity of the original. Adaptation is conversion of an original work to another genre or medium (e.g. a short film script into a stage play, etc.)


	 


	The process for creating a literary or dramatic work can be an arduous one. For each project we conduct a needs assessment to determine the trends in certain categories of theater and film entertainment that enjoy popularity at the time. The theater and cinema culture is cyclical in nature; every once in a while a certain vision, topic or genre becomes popular, and producers release films and performances that adhere to this style or genre until the current interest and demand fizzle down. Other genres then take over and the process runs full cycle again. For purposes of demand and marketability, choosing a trend/genre that is currently on the edge of popularity is vital, and this is why a proper needs assessment is essential. We consider it the most important aspect of the entire process.


	 


	Next, we determine the feasibility of making our product a success. We consider our product a success when it garnishes interest from prospective buyers and results in a sale or option contract. During our feasibility analysis we explore and analyze similar films and performances in a chosen category that were proven successful over time to identify the creative and commercial attributes that made them work in order to utilize them for our projects.


	 


	We then identify the audience who we intend to reach through our product. Knowing the audience is important because it determines the content that will appear in the writing, as it may vary greatly depending on the intended audience. Targeting the product at specific audience increases the chances of the product sparking interest from potential buyers, so we must determine the market we intend our product for and cater to this audience’s expectations throughout our writing.


	 


	Further, we move to concept development. We identify an idea or a story within a genre that is popular or gaining in popularity based on our needs assessment analysis. This is considered a product’s early development where a story outline is created. Once the story outline takes shape, writing, or actual creative development, begins. It is the most time-consuming part of the process during which a workable script is crafted from a story outline. This crucial phase includes developing the format, narrative (plot, characters, story lines) and dialogue; introducing conflict, climax and resolution; writing out scene-by-scene physical interaction, utilizing symbolism, etc. The drafts are then rewritten and polished numerous times until we believe they are ready to be marketed for sale, at which time a logline and synopsis to convey both the content and the tone of the completed work are prepared for prospective clients' review and consideration. Litera makes sure to prepare these carefully thought out and compelling to engage and excite a prospective client about the potential of the project.


	 


	All phases of our product development, marketing and sales are conducted exclusively by Mr. Gardner, who devotes full time to the Company’s operations. To-date, no capital has been expensed for development of our works. Litera develops products "on spec" (i.e. non-commissioned) and advertises them directly to our target market. Mr. Gardner uses his numerous industry contacts and studio introductions that he has developed over course of his career in entertainment business as the starting point in our clientele building. Depending on the complexity of the project, it takes Mr. Gardner about 2-6 weeks to produce a product ready for marketing.


	 



	TARGET MARKET AND OUR NICHE WITHIN



	 


	It is essential for the Company’s success to identify a niche in the entertainment market and fill the unsatisfied demand. To select a niche in the entertainment market that Litera could cater to, the Company researched core groups of professionals within the large demographic entertainment community who have similar needs and interests that could be targeted with excellent results. All the research data was derived from available industry and marketing information accumulated by our sole officer and director and required no expenses. We were able to establish that, having weathered financial storms in the past decade, the dynamics within the entertainment industry encountered changes which resulted in an acute shortage of development capital for new projects both in film and theater. While major studios and production companies maintain control of the high-end of the market and the big movies and shows, the independent film and theatrical producers have proven themselves to be more efficient making low budget films and theater shows. To save time and money, indie producers and small studios do not outlay expenses associated with creation of a literary or dramatic work, but instead procure completed aspiring projects to produce or distribute from others. Litera will target independent film and theatrical producers and small and experimental production studios that constantly scout for new exciting projects to produce and distribute. This is the market niche that Litera has selected and will focus on.


	 




	 




	13














	Table of Contents





	 



	COMPETITION, OUR COMPETITIVE STRATEGY AND METHODS OF COMPETITION



	 


	The film and theater production industry is highly competitive, and our Company faces competition ranging from large and well established film and theater production companies to thousands of small firms engaged in developing and producing play and screenplay options and other material in a similar manner as Litera and seeking to enter the industry.


	 


	Our competitive strategy is based on the facts that while Litera is at a significant disadvantage to more established competitors due to our lack of financial resources, scarcity of relationships within the film and theater production community and absence of major marketing tools, the barriers to entry into the industry are nevertheless relatively low. It takes skills, knowledge and contacts to develop and sell products and services similar to ours. The Company believes that Mr. Gardner's pre-existing industry connections, his experience and background may allow us to tap into the theater and film production industry with a certain level of credibility. We will aim to produce creatively unique projects to gain the competitive edge we need while watching closely for emerging trends in theater and cinema and demands of the audience.


	 


	The Company’s primary method of competition is to market specifically to independent and experimental film makers and small theater production companies. To save time and money, indie producers and small studios do not outlay expenses associated with creation of a literary or dramatic work, and therefore, they rely on others to supply them with well-written material. We believe that since we have chosen this specific niche market, we will be able to target the right audience and cater to its demands.


	 



	MARKETING, MARKETING OBJECTIVES AND STRATEGIES



	 


	Litera markets its products and services directly to the theater and film production community, focusing specifically on independent film and theatrical producers and small and experimental production studios.


	 


	Our Marketing Objectives are as follows:


	 









	·



	Establishing and promoting our presence in our selected targeted market







	 




	 








	·



	Creating and maintaining a media list of theater and film entertainment PR agencies and advertising firms contacts







	 




	 








	·



	Building a network of theater and film industry professional relationships and referrals




	 


	To promote and market our products and services, we may incorporate the following strategies:


	 









	·



	Establishing online presence by designing a corporate website reflecting products and scope of services offered. We will also engage in a search engine optimization campaign to improve visibility of our website and assist us with awareness for our products and services. Optimizing a website may involve editing its content and HTML and associated coding to both increase its relevance to specific keywords and to remove barriers to the indexing activities of search engines.







	 




	 








	·



	Approaching our industry target market by email. The most basic method of contacting is a carefully thought out query letter, sent via email, which consists of a one-paragraph synopsis of a project, a bio, a logline, in standard business format. Focusing specifically on our selected target market community who have similar needs and interests may yield excellent results.







	 




	 








	·



	Engaging a PR campaign to obtain publicity and increase visibility for our business.







	 




	 








	·



	Participating in writers’ conferences and pitch fests, as well as submitting completed scripts for selection to film and theater festivals. While winning a contest is obviously a good way to add value to the product, even entering in such competitions will result in getting exposure for our Company and in some cases in reviews.




	 


	Currently, Mr. Gardner promotes our products through many channels, including networking at local film and theater festivals and Internet sources, as well as expanding his personal professional relationships with small and experimental studios and independent producers. While Mr. Gardner has limited experience in developing and expanding a client base and marketing products to them, we anticipate that, as the Company grows over the next sixteen months, pools of expertise will be acquired by recruiting within the theater and film production industry and by the use of technical and marketing consultants, which will allow qualified individuals to join Mr. Gardner on our management team and Board of Directors.


	 


	Currently, Litera does not have any existing relationships with PR agents, publicists, producers or producer’s agents.


	 




	 




	14














	Table of Contents





	 



	RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT



	 


	The Company has not expended funds for research and development costs since inception. Other than utilizing Mr. Gardner’s experiences and available industry and marketing information, Litera has not undertaken any research and development activities regarding our target market and marketability of our products.


	 



	THEATRICAL AND FILM PRODUCTION INDUSTRY



	 


	The major business centers of film and theatrical production are concentrated in the United States, Europe, India and China. The theatrical and film production industry consists of the technological and commercial institutions that are involved in creation of a film or stage performance, such as: production companies, studios, cinematography, choreography, production, screen/playwriting, pre-production, post production, film and theater festivals, actors, dancers, singers, film and theatrical producers, directors and other personnel. Due to the great expense required to produce a movie or a stage play, the making of a film or a performance usually has to be done in conjunction with an already established production company. However, the production of independent films and small scale stage performances has begun to evolve with the advent of more affordable equipment and more sophisticated consumer technology, as well as the increasing visibility of independent festivals such as Sundance Film Festival or Contemporary American Theater Festival. Independent projects are often described as less commercially-driven art forms which differ significantly from the norms of plot-driven, mainstream classical Hollywood cinema or Broadway theater. Catering specifically to the needs of independent film and theatrical producers and small and experimental production studios is the focus of the Company’s business.


	 



	OUR SIGNIFICANT EMPLOYEE



	 


	We currently have one employee, Mr. Gardner who is our founder and serves as our sole officer and director. Mr. Gardner currently devotes full time to our business and is responsible for our daily operations including product development, sales and marketing, fund raising, implementation of our general strategy and execution of our business plan.


	 


	Our future business and operating results depend significantly on the continued contributions and active participation of Mr. Gardner. This individual would be difficult or impossible to replace. The loss of this key contributor, or his failure to perform, could materially and adversely affect our Company’s operations. While we may obtain Key Man insurance, such insurance may not be sufficient to cover the loss incurred in the event this executive officer is lost.


	 


	Currently, our officer and director receives no compensation for his services during the development stage of our business operations. He is reimbursed for any out-of-pocket expenses he may incur on our behalf. In the future, we may approve payment of salaries for officers and directors, but currently, no such plans have been approved. We anticipate adding two (2) employees over the next twelve (12) months, one of which will be a screen/play writer. We do not have any employment agreements in place with our officer and director. We also do not currently have any benefits, such as health or life insurance, available to our employee.


	 



	Critical Accounting Policies



	 


	Our discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations are based upon our financial statements, which have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. The preparation of these financial statements requires us to make estimates and judgments that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses, and related disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities. We monitor our estimates on an on-going basis for changes in facts and circumstances, and material changes in these estimates could occur in the future. Changes in estimates are recorded in the period in which they become known. We base our estimates on historical experience and other assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the circumstances. Actual results may differ from our estimates if past experience or other assumptions do not turn out to be substantially accurate.


	 


	Certain of our accounting policies are particularly important to the portrayal and understanding of our financial position and results of operations and require us to apply significant judgment in their application. As a result, these policies are subject to an inherent degree of uncertainty. In applying these policies, we use our judgment in making certain assumption and estimates. Our critical accounting policies are outlined in Note 1 in the Notes to the Financial Statements


	 




	 




	15














	Table of Contents





	 



	Results of Operations for the three months ended September 30, 2016 and 2015



	 


	We had $10,000 in revenues in the three months ended September 30, 2016, compared to $13,500 for the three months ended September 30, 2015. The decrease in revenue is a result of the sale of less literary and dramatic products. We anticipate a continued trend of literary and dramatic product sales revenue as we continue to develop such products. Our operating expenses were $18,793, which consisted of professional fees of $6,344 and general and administrative expenses of $12,449 for the three months ended September 30, 2016. For the three months ended September 30, 2015, our operating expenses were $10,519, which consisted of professional fees of $9,635 and general and administrative expenses of $884. The increase in operating expenses was primarily due to increased general and administrative expenses. Our net income was $(8,793) for the three months ended September 30, 2016 and was $2,981 for the three months ended September 30, 2015. The /decrease was primarily due to increased general and administrative expenses.


	 



	Results of Operations for the nine months ended September 30, 2016 and 2015



	 


	We had $38,000 in revenues in the nine months ended September 30, 2016 and $13,500 in revenue from inception through September 30, 2015. Our revenue increase is a result of the sale of more literary and dramatic products. We anticipate a continued trend of literary and dramatic product sales revenue as we continue to develop such products. Our operating expenses were $71,578, which consisted of professional fees of $38,704 and general and administrative expenses of $32,874 for the nine months ended September 30, 2016. From inception through September 30, 2015, our operating expenses were $11,018, which consisted of professional fees of $9,635 and general and administrative expenses of $1,383. The increase in operating expenses are primarily due to increases in both professional fees, as well as general and administrative costs. Our net income was $(33,578) for the three months ended September 30, 2016 and was $2,482 from inception through September 30, 2015. The decrease was due to increased expenses.


	 



	Liquidity and Capital Resources



	 


	The Company's cash position was $23,824 at September 30, 2016. As of September 30, 2016, the Company had current assets of $27,324 and current liabilities of $0, respectively. As of September 30, 2015, the Company had current assets of $23,081 and current liabilities of $0. This resulted in a working capital of $27,324 at September 30, 2016 and a working capital of $23,081 at September 30, 2015.


	 


	Net cash used in operating activities amounted to $(37,749) for the nine months ended September 30, 2016. This is primarily due to general operating expenses.


	 


	Net cash used in investing activities amounted to $0 for the nine months ended September 30, 2016.


	 


	Net cash provided by financing activities amounted to $0 for the nine months ended September 30, 2016.


	 


	The Company does not have sufficient capital to meet its current cash needs, which include the costs of compliance with the continuing reporting requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. The Company intends to seek additional capital through the sale literary and dramatic products. Financing options may be available to the Company either via a private placement or through the public sale of stock. There is no assurance, however, that the available funds will be available or adequate. Its need for additional financing is likely to persist.


	 



	Going Concern



	 


	Our financial statements have been prepared on a going concern basis. As of September 30, 2016, we have not generated significant revenues since inception. We expect to finance our operations primarily through our existing cash, our operations and any future financing. However, there exists substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern because we will be required to obtain additional capital in the future to continue our operations and there is no assurance that we will be able to obtain such capital, through equity or debt financing, or any combination thereof, or on satisfactory terms or at all. Additionally, no assurance can be given that any such financing, if obtained, will be adequate to meet our capital needs. If adequate capital cannot be obtained on a timely basis and on satisfactory terms, our operations would be materially negatively impacted. Therefore, our auditor has substantial doubt as to our ability to continue as a going concern. Our ability to complete additional offerings is dependent on the state of the debt and/or equity markets at the time of any proposed offering, and such market’s reception of the Company and the offering terms. There is no assurance that capital in any form would be available to us, and if available, on terms and conditions that are acceptable.


	 



	Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements



	 


	We have no off-balance sheet arrangements.


	 




	 




	16














	Table of Contents






	 






	Item 3. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk




	 


	Not Applicable.



	 






	Item 4. Controls and Procedures




	 




	Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures




	 


	Disclosure controls and procedures are controls and other procedures that are designed to ensure that information we are required to disclose is recorded, processed, summarized and reported, within the time periods specified in the rules and forms of the Commission. Wade Gardner, our President and our Principal Accounting Officer, is responsible for establishing and maintaining our disclosure controls and procedures.


	 


	Under the supervision and with the participation of our management, including the President and Principal Accounting Officer, we have evaluated the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) and Rule 15d-15(e) of the Exchange Act) as of the end of the period covered by this report. Based on that evaluation, the President and Principal Accounting Officer has concluded that, as of September 30, 2016, these disclosure controls and procedures were not effective in ensuring that all information required to be disclosed by us in the reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is: (i) recorded, processed, summarized and reported, within the time periods specified in the Commission’s rule and forms; and (ii) accumulated and communicated to our management, including our President and Principal Accounting Officer, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. 


	 


	The term “internal control over financial reporting” is defined as a process designed by, or under the supervision of, the registrant’s principal executive and principal financial officers, or persons performing similar functions, and effected by the registrant’s board of directors, management and other personnel, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and includes those policies and procedures that:


	 








	¨





	pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the registrant;






	 




	 







	¨





	provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the registrant are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the registrant; and






	 




	 







	¨





	provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the registrant’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.





	 



	Changes in Internal Controls over Financial Reporting



	 


	There were no additional changes in our internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2016 that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.


	 



	Inherent Limitations over Internal Controls



	 


	Litera’s management does not expect that its disclosure controls or its internal control over financial reporting will prevent or detect all error and all fraud. A control system, no matter how well designed and operated, can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the control system’s objectives will be met. The design of a control system must reflect the fact that there are resource constraints, and the benefits of controls must be considered relative to their costs. Further, because of the inherent limitations in all control systems, no evaluation of controls can provide absolute assurance that misstatements due to error or fraud will not occur or that all control issues and instances of fraud, if any, within Litera have been detected. These inherent limitations include the realities that judgments in decision making can be faulty and that breakdowns can occur because of simple error or mistake. Controls can also be circumvented by the individual acts of some persons, by collusion of two or more people, or management override of the controls. The design of any system of controls is based in part on certain assumptions about the likelihood of future events, and there can be no assurance that any design will succeed in achieving its stated goals under all potential future conditions. Projections of any evaluation of controls effectiveness to future periods are subject to risks. Over time, controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions or deterioration in the degree of compliance with policies or procedures.


	 


	Our disclosure controls and procedures are designed to provide reasonable assurance of that our reports will be accurate. Our President and Principal Accounting Officer concludes that our disclosure controls and procedures were effective at that reasonable assurance level, as of the end of the period covered by this Form 10-Q. Our future reports shall also indicate that our disclosure controls and procedures are designed for this reason and shall indicate the related conclusion by the President and Principal Accounting Officer as to their effectiveness.


	 




	 




	17














	Table of Contents







	 






	PART II. OTHER INFORMATION




	 






	Item 1. Legal Proceedings




	 


	We are not a party to any material or legal proceeding and, to our knowledge, none is contemplated or threatened.



	 






	Item 2. Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities and Use of Proceeds




	 


	None.



	 






	Item 3. Defaults Upon Senior Securities




	 


	There have been no defaults upon senior securities.



	 






	Item 4. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders




	 


	None.



	 






	Item 5. Other Information




	 


	Not Applicable


	 




	 




	18














	Table of Contents






	 






	Item 6. Exhibits




	 


	(a) Exhibits


	 










	EXHIBIT NO.





	 





	DESCRIPTION







	 




	 




	 






	3.1*




	 




	Articles of Incorporation 






	 




	 




	 






	31.1*




	 




	By-Laws






	 




	 




	 






	10.1#




	 




	Comedic Sketch Purchase Agreement, dated July 29, 2016, by and between Litera Group, Inc. and Mark Geiger






	 




	 




	 






	10.2**




	 




	Literary Material Purchase Agreement, dated September 21, 2016, by and between Litera Group, Inc. and Franklin Johnson.






	 




	 




	 






	10.3***




	 




	Option and Literary Purchase Agreement, dated September 29, 2016, by and between Litera Group, Inc. and Jennifer Fox.






	 




	 




	 







	31.1








	Section 302 Certification of President 







	 




	 




	 







	31.2





	 





	Section 302 Certification of Chief Financial Officer 







	 




	 




	 







	32.1





	 





	Section 906 Certification of President







	 




	 




	 







	32.2





	 





	Section 906 Certification of Chief Financial Officer







	 




	 




	 






	101.INS




	 




	XBRL Instance Document






	 




	 




	 






	101.SCH




	 




	XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document






	 




	 




	 






	101.CAL




	 




	XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase






	 




	 




	 






	101.DEF




	 




	XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase






	 




	 




	 






	101.LAB




	 




	XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase






	 




	 




	 






	101.PRE




	 




	XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase





	__________________








	*




	Filed as Exhibits to the Form S-1, filed on November 10, 2015, and incorporated herein by reference.






	#




	Filed as an Exhibit to the Form 8-K, filed on August 1, 2016 and incorporated herein by reference.






	**




	Filed as an Exhibit to the Form 8-K, filed on September 23, 2016 and incorporated herein by reference.






	***




	Filed as an Exhibit to the Form 8-K, filed on September 30, 2016 and incorporated herein by reference.




	 



	 




	19














	Table of Contents







	 






	SIGNATURES




	 


	Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.


	 


	 







	Dated: November 8, 2016




	By: 





	/s/ Wade Gardner











	 




	Wade Gardner








	 




	 




	Chairman of the Board, President, Chief Financial Officer and Principal Accounting Officer




	 





	 


	Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.


	 


	 







	By:





	/s/ Wade Gardner





	 




	Dated: November 8, 2016






	 




	Wade Gardner










	 




	Chairman of the Board, President, Chief Financial Officer, and Principal Accounting Officer









	 


	 







	20






	 









	EXHIBIT 31.1



	 





	CERTIFICATION



	 


	I, Wade Gardner, certify that:


	 







	1.




	I have reviewed this report on Form 10-Q of Litera Group, Inc.;





	 







	2.




	Based on my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the period covered by this report;





	 







	3.




	Based on my knowledge, the financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material respects the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in this report;





	 







	4.




	The registrant’s other certifying officer(s) and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the registrant and have:





	 







	 




	a.




	Designed such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision, to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;





	 







	 




	b.




	Designed such internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;






	 




	 




	 








	c.




	Evaluated the effectiveness of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation; and





	 







	 




	d.




	Disclosed in this report any change in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant’s most recent fiscal quarter (the small business issuer’s fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual report) that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting.





	 







	5.




	The registrant’s other certifying officer(s) and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting, to the registrant’s auditors and the audit committee of the registrant’s board of directors (of persons performing the equivalent functions):





	 







	 




	a.




	All significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant’s ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information; and





	 







	 




	b.




	Any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the small business issuer’s internal control over financial reporting.





	 


	 







	Date: November 8, 2016



	By:




	/s/ Wade Gardner













	Wade Gardner












	President


	(Principal Executive Officer)








	 









	EXHIBIT 31.2



	 





	CERTIFICATION



	 


	I, Wade Gardner, certify that:


	 







	1.




	I have reviewed this report on Form 10-Q of Litera Group, Inc.;





	 







	2.




	Based on my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the period covered by this report;





	 







	3.




	Based on my knowledge, the financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material respects the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in this report;





	 







	4.




	The registrant’s other certifying officer(s) and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the registrant and have:





	 







	 




	a.




	Designed such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision, to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;





	 







	 




	b.




	Designed such internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;





	 







	 




	c.




	Evaluated the effectiveness of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation; and





	 







	 




	d.




	Disclosed in this report any change in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant’s most recent fiscal quarter (the small business issuer’s fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual report) that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting.





	 







	5.




	The registrant’s other certifying officer(s) and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting, to the registrant’s auditors and the audit committee of the registrant’s board of directors (of persons performing the equivalent functions):





	 







	 




	a.




	All significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant’s ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information; and





	 







	 




	b.




	Any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the small business issuer’s internal control over financial reporting.





	 


	 






	Date: November 8, 2016


	By:




	/s/ Wade Gardner













	Wade Gardner












	Chief Financial Officer


	(Principal Financial/Accounting Officer)








	 









	EXHIBIT 32.1



	 





	CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO




	418 U.S.C. SECTION 1350,




	AS ADOPTED PURSUANT TO




	SECTION 906 OF THE SARBANES-OXLEY ACT OF 2002



	 


	In connection with the Quarterly Report of Litera Group, Inc. (the “Company”) on Form 10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2016 (the “Report”) I, Wade Gardner, President of the Company, certify, pursuant to 18 USC Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, that to the best of my knowledge and belief:


	 







	 




	(1)




	The Report fully complies with the requirements of Section 13(a) or 15(d)of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and






	 




	 




	 






	 




	(2)




	The information contained in the Report fairly presents, in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations of the Company.





	 


	 







	Date: November 8, 2016



	By:




	/s/ Wade Gardner









	 




	 




	Wade Gardner




	 






	 




	 




	President and




	 





	 


	This certification accompanies the Report pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and shall not, except to the extent required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, be deemed filed by the Company for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.



	 









	EXHIBIT 32.2



	 





	CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO




	18 U.S.C. SECTION 1350,




	AS ADOPTED PURSUANT TO




	SECTION 906 OF THE SARBANES-OXLEY ACT OF 2002



	 


	In connection with the Quarterly Report of Litera Group, Inc. (the “Company”) on Form 10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2016 (the “Report”) I, Wade Gardner, Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial/Accounting Officer) of the Company, certify, pursuant to 18 USC Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, that to the best of my knowledge and belief:


	 







	 




	(1)




	The Report fully complies with the requirements of Section 13(a) or 15(d)of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and






	 




	 




	 






	 




	(2)




	The information contained in the Report fairly presents, in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations of the Company.





	 


	 







	Date: November 8, 2016



	By:




	/s/ Wade Gardner












	Wade Gardner



	 










	Chief Financial Officer







	 


	This certification accompanies the Report pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and shall not, except to the extent required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, be deemed filed by the Company for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.



	 









 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.







Litera Group Inc














































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog











Related Companies

Adelman Enterprises, Inc.
Advanced Media
All American Communications
Alliance Media Group Holdings, Inc.
America Asia Corp.
American Management Services, Inc
Asgaard Media
Audience Productions, Inc.
Autris
Ballroom Dance Fitness
Blue Sky Media
CBS Operations Inc.
CORE Media Group
Camelot Entertainment Group
Carolco Pictures Inc



        More Related Companies
      





Home



Sample Contracts



By Company


Litera Group Inc




Litera Group Inc





      Loading...
    





Standard IndustryClassification
Services-motion picture & video tape productionAddress

5751 Buckingham Pkwy, Culver City, CA 90230
Phone
424-543-4066



Sample Contracts



Litera Group Inc –
Term Sheet
(June 26th, 2017)
THIS TERM SHEET (hereinafter "Term Sheet") is entered into as of this day of June 19, 2017, by and among FIRST FOODS GROUP, INC., a Nevada corporation (the "Company" or "FIFG"), with offices at 720 Monroe Street, Suite E210, Hoboken, NJ 07030, and The Big Salad Franchise Company, LLC, a Michigan limited liability company ("TBS"), with offices at 18530 Mack Avenue, #555, Grosse Pointe Farms, Ml 48236 and John Bornoty ("Sole Member") where specifically referenced upon the following terms and conditions:



Litera Group Inc –
Term Sheet
(June 23rd, 2017)
THIS TERM SHEET (hereinafter "Term Sheet") is entered into as of this day of June 19, 2017, by and among FIRST FOODS GROUP, INC., a Nevada corporation (the "Company" or "FIFG"), with offices at 720 Monroe Street, Suite E210, Hoboken, NJ 07030, and The Big Salad Franchise Company, LLC, a Michigan limited liability company ("TBS"), with offices at 18530 Mack Avenue, #555, Grosse Pointe Farms, Ml 48236 and John Bornoty ("Sole Member") where specifically referenced upon the following terms and conditions:



Litera Group Inc –
Binding Term Sheet
(April 24th, 2017)
THIS BINDING TERM SHEET (hereinafter referred to as this "Term Sheet") is entered into as of this day 21st of April, 2017, by and among FIRST FOODS GROUP, INC., a Nevada corporation (the "Company" or "FIFG"), with offices at 720 Monroe Street, Suite E210, Hoboken, NJ 07030, and ODED BRENNER ("Brenner"), upon the following terms and conditions:



Litera Group Inc –
Employment Agreement
(March 7th, 2017)
Effective March 1, 2017 (the "Effective Date") Mark J. Keeley (the "Employee") and First Food Group, Inc. (the "Corporation") enter into this Employment Agreement (the "Agreement") as follows:



Litera Group Inc –
Consulting Agreement
(March 2nd, 2017)
This Consulting Agreement entered into by and between First Foods Group, Inc., a Nevada corporation ("FIFG"), and Attorney Harold Kestenbaum of Melville, NY ("HK") does hereby bind the parties to the following terms and conditions:



Litera Group Inc –
Production Play Agreement
(December 7th, 2016)
This AGREEMENT entered into this 5th day of December, 2016 (Effective Date), by and between LITERA GROUP, INC., hereinafter referred to as the "AUTHOR," and Thomas Cooper, hereinafter referred to as the "PRODUCER," to present and to produce a production of a PRODUCER piece now entitled Gruesome Twosome Show, hereinafter referred to as the "PLAY."



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(September 30th, 2016)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of September 29, 2016 by and between Litera Group Inc (hereinafter "Writer") and Jennifer Fox (hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Literary Material Purchase Agreement
(September 23rd, 2016)
This Agreement ("Agreement") is made as of September 21st 2016, by and between Litera Group, Inc., a Nevada Corporation ("Owner") and Franklin Johnson, an individual ("Purchaser")



Litera Group Inc –
Comedic Sketch Purchase Agreement
(August 1st, 2016)
This Agreement ("Agreement") is made as of July 29th, 2016, by and between Litera Group, Inc., a Nevada Corporation ("Owner") and Mark Geiger, an individual ("Purchaser")



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(July 5th, 2016)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of June 29, 2016 by and between LITERA GROUP (hereinafter "Writer") and NICK DAVIS (hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(June 21st, 2016)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of June 20th, 2016 by and between LITERA GROUP (hereinafter "Writer") and RAJ KADAVUL (hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(June 21st, 2016)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of June 17th, 2016 by and between LITERA GROUP (hereinafter "Writer") and Simon Moore (hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(June 16th, 2016)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of June 13th, 2016 by and between LITERA GROUP INC (hereinafter "Writer") and HOWARD GROSS (hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(April 1st, 2016)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of March 28th, 2016 by and between LITERA GROUP INC (hereinafter "Writer") and MICHAEL WHITE (hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Comedic Sketch Purchase Agreement
(April 1st, 2016)
This Agreement ("Agreement") is made as of March 30h, 2016, by and between Litera Group, Inc., a Nevada Corporation ("Owner") and Mark Warren, an individual ("Purchaser")



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(March 1st, 2016)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of February 26th, 2016 by and between LITERA GROUP (hereinafter "Writer") and BRIAN MORGAN (hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(December 30th, 2015)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of December 29th, 2015 by and between LITERA GROUP (hereinafter "Writer") and Andrew Norris(hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(December 30th, 2015)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of December 28th, 2015 by and between LITERA GROUP (hereinafter "Writer") and Chris Sperling(hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Production Play Agreement
(November 25th, 2015)
This AGREEMENT entered into this 24th day of November, 2015 (Effective Date), by and between LITERA GROUP, INC., hereinafter referred to as the "AUTHOR," and Mike Barker, hereinafter referred to as the "PRODUCER," to present and to produce a production of a PRODUCER piece now entitled My Penguin Dance,  hereinafter referred to as the "PLAY."



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(November 5th, 2015)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of September 29th, 2015 by and between LITERA GROUP (hereinafter "Writer") and WILLIAM CONWAY(hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(September 14th, 2015)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of August 24th, 2015 by and between LITERA GROUP (hereinafter "Writer") and JASON BROWN (hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(September 14th, 2015)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of August 10th, 2015 by and between LITERA GROUP (hereinafter "Writer") and MICHAEL PRICE (hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
By-Laws OF LITERA GROUP, INC. ARTICLE I STOCKHOLDERS
(August 10th, 2015)




Litera Group Inc –
Option and Literary Purchase Agreement
(August 10th, 2015)
This AGREEMENT, made and entered into as of July 6th, 2015 by and between LITERA GROUP (hereinafter "Writer") and MICHAEL WILSON (hereinafter "Producer").



Litera Group Inc –
Production Play Agreement
(August 10th, 2015)
This AGREEMENT entered into this 7th day of JULY, 2015 (Effective Date), by and between LITERA GROUP, INC., hereinafter referred to as the "AUTHOR," and Brian White, hereinafter referred to as the "PRODUCER," to present and to produce a production of a PRODUCER piece now entitled Tiramisu, hereinafter referred to as the "PLAY."



Litera Group Inc –
Subscription Agreement LITERA GROUP, INC.
(August 10th, 2015)




Litera Group Inc –
Comedic Sketch Purchase Agreement
(August 10th, 2015)
This Agreement ("Agreement") is made as of July 13th, 2015, by and between Litera Group, Inc., a Nevada Corporation ("Owner") and Chris Kelly, an individual ("Purchaser")



Litera Group Inc –
Contract
(August 10th, 2015)














×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.










Contract and Agreement Category List











































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog







Sample Contract Categories 

a

b

c

d

e

f

g

h

i

j

k

l

m

n

o

p

q

r

s

t

u

v

w

x

y

z


abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz


337k
		Delaware
	

277k
		New York
	

113k
		California
	

70k
		Texas
	

68k
		Agreement
	

62k
		Nevada
	

46k
		Florida
	

44k
		Maryland
	

40k
		Illinois
	

38k
		Employment Agreement
	

38k
		Washington
	

37k
		Amended And Restated
	

36k
		Massachusetts
	

34k
		New Jersey
	

33k
		Pennsylvania
	

28k
		Georgia
	

28k
		Colorado
	

26k
		Ohio
	

25k
		Minnesota
	

25k
		Virginia
	

21k
		North Carolina
	

20k
		Incentive Plan
	

19k
		Credit Agreement
	

19k
		Amendment
	

16k
		Connecticut
	

16k
		Michigan
	

15k
		Indiana
	

14k
		Registration Rights Agreement
	

14k
		Recitals
	

13k
		Tennessee
	

13k
		Arizona
	

13k
		Missouri
	

12k
		Purchase Agreement
	

12k
		Promissory Note
	

12k
		Indenture
	

11k
		Warrant
	

11k
		Louisiana
	

11k
		Kansas
	

11k
		Utah
	

11k
		Wisconsin
	

10k
		Oklahoma
	

9k
		Securities Purchase Agreement
	

9k
		Agreement And Plan Of Merger
	

8k
		Iowa
	

8k
		Supplemental Indenture
	

8k
		Note
	

8k
		Equity Incentive Plan
	

7k
		Kentucky
	

7k
		Stock Purchase Agreement
	

7k
		Alabama
	














×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.



















 













 


First Foods Group, Inc. 8-K Jan  6 2017 | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»First Foods Group, Inc. (FIFG)FORM 8-K | Current reportJan  6 2017|About: First Foods Group, Inc. (FIFG)View as PDF

 Litera Group Inc (Form: 8-K, Received: 01/06/2017 06:04:43) 





















	 




	UNITED STATES






	SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION






	Washington, D.C. 20549




	 




	FORM 8-K

	 



	 



	CURRENT REPORT



	 



	Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d)




	of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934



	 


	Date of Report (date of earliest event reported): 


	December 30, 2016




	 











	LITERA GROUP, INC.








	(Exact Name of Registrant as Specified in its Charter)





	 








	Nevada










	333-206260










	47-4145514







	 (State of incorporation)






	 (Commission File Number)






	 (IRS Employer Identification No.)






	 




	5751 Buckingham Pkwy Culver City, CA 90230






	(Address of principal executive offices)


	 




	(424) 543-4006




	 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code)


	 




	N/A




	(Former Name or former address if changed from last report.)


	 


	Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):


	 



	¨

	Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)


	 



	¨

	Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)


	 



	¨

	Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))


	 



	¨

	Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))


	 


















	 




	 













	 










	Item 5.01 Changes in Control of Registrant.




	 


	On December 30, 2016, as a result of a private transaction, the control block of voting stock of this company, represented by 10,500,000 shares of common stock (the “Shares”), has been transferred from Wade Gardner to Rosenweiss Capital LLC, and a change of control of Litera Group, Inc. (the “Company”) has occurred. The consideration paid for the Shares, which represent 74% of the issued and outstanding share capital of the Company on a fully-diluted basis, was $200,000. The source of the cash consideration for the Shares was company funds of Rosenweiss Capital LLC. In connection with the transaction, Mr. Gardner released the Company from all debts owed to him.


	 


	There are no arrangements or understandings among members of both the former and new control persons and their associates with respect to the election of directors of the Company or other matters. The information set forth in Item 5.02 of this Form 8-K is incorporated by reference into this Item 5.01.



	 






	Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.




	 


	Upon the change of control of the Company, which occurred on December 30, 2016, the existing director and officer resigned immediately. Accordingly, Wade Gardner, serving as the sole director and as the only officer, ceased to be the Company’s President and Principal Accounting Officer. At the effective date of the transfer, Abraham Rosenblum assumed the role of a director and President, Chief Executive Officer, Chief Financial Officer, Secretary, and Treasurer of the Company. At the effective date of the transfer, Hershel Weiss assumed the role of a director of the Company.


	 


	Abraham Rosenblum, age 37, began his career in the automotive industry as a distributor of wholesale parts, and eventually moved into owning and developing real estate. Mr. Rosenblum has worked with “A rated” tenants with several large corporations such as TD Bank, Walgreens and Family Dollar. In 2007, Mr. Rosenblum began investing in real estate along with institutional lenders. Mr. Rosenblum was the President of a telecommunications carrier network, Tandem Transit, which he helped form and finance for five years. Mr. Rosenblum was educated at YTC in Brooklyn New York. He served on the Board of Directors for several technology companies and automotive distribution outlets. Mr. Rosenblum remains active in several charitable organizations.


	 


	Hershel (Hershy) Weiss, age 43, is the Co-Founding Member of First Food Group Inc. Mr. Weiss has been active in the New Jersey, Connecticut and Massachusetts real estate market for the last 21 years. As an employee at Basad Management LLC and as a principal, Mr. Weiss has been involved in residential, office, industrial and retail sectors of the market, starting in maintenance, moving up to renovations and construction, environmental remediation, then on to financing, including complicated deal structures with lenders and investors and finally acquisitions and redevelopment. Mr. Weiss actively negotiates leases in the commercial and retail sectors and has become very familiar with the retail food industry by working with tenants starting out in the industry.






	 







	Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.



	 


	(d) Exhibits.


	  







	99.1




	 




	Resignation and appointment of officer and directors.





	 






	 




	2













	 






	 





	SIGNATURES



	 


	Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


	 


	 










	Litera Group, Inc.









	 




	 




	 





	Date: January 5, 2017



	By:





	/s/ Abraham Rosenblum









	 




	Name:




	Abraham Rosenblum




	 






	 



	Title:



	President




	 








	 






	 




	3













	 





	 





	EXHIBIT INDEX



	 








	Exhibit No.








	Document Description















	99.1






	Resignation and appointment of officers and directors.





	 


	 







	4






	 









	EXHIBIT 99.1



	 



	DIRECTORS RESOLUTIONS




	OF





	LITERA GROUP, INC.





	(the “Company”)



	 



	WHEREAS:



	 






	A.


	Wade Gardner has consented to step down as an officer and as a Member of the Board of Directors of the Company.





	 




	 





	B.


	Abraham Rosenblum has consented to act as the new President, CEO, CFO, Treasurer, Secretary and Chairman of the Board of Directors of the Company.





	 




	 





	C.


	Hershel Weiss has consented to act as a member of the Board of Directors of the Company.




	 



	BE IT RESOLVED THAT

	:


	 







	D.




	Wade Gardner stepped down as an officer and as a Member of the Board of Directors of the Company.








	 






	E.




	Abraham Rosenblum, as appointee of Purchasers, has consented to act as the new President, CEO, CFO, Treasurer, Secretary and Chairman of the Board of Directors of the Company.








	 






	F.




	Hershel Weiss has consented to act as a member of the Board of Directors of the Company.






	 




	 






	 




	Effective date: December 30, 2016





	 











	/s/ Wade Gardner








	 




	 



	Wade Gardner


	 




	 


	 




	 




	 


	 



	/s/ Abraham Rosenblum



	 





	 




	 




	Abraham Rosenblum




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 






	 




	 





	/s/ Hershel Weiss





	 






	 




	 




	Hershel Weiss




	 





	 












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          


















Amazon.com: Prime Music









































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Digital Music



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store         Open Web Player MP3 cart Settings























































































Prime members stream free. Prime Music features a growing selection of 2 million songs, is always ad-free and on-demand.




Want more music? Unlock tens of millions of songs on Amazon Music Unlimited.  Prime members save 20%





            Try Prime
          




Prime members stream free. Prime Music features a growing selection of 2 million songs, is always ad-free and on-demand.




Want more music? Unlock tens of millions of songs on Amazon Music Unlimited.  Prime members save 20%





            Try Prime
          




Prime members stream free. Prime Music features a growing selection of 2 million songs, is always ad-free and on-demand.




Want more music? Unlock tens of millions of songs on Amazon Music Unlimited.  Prime members save 20%





            Try Prime
          
















Curated playlists and personalized stations




Just start listening. Choose from playlists curated by our music experts, or personalized stations to fit every moment.




Curated playlists and personalized stations




Just start listening. Choose from playlists curated by our music experts, or personalized stations to fit every moment.




Curated playlists and personalized stations




Just start listening. Choose from playlists curated by our music experts, or personalized stations to fit every moment.
















Music anytime, anywhere




Listen ad-free and on-demand with unlimited skips and offline playback.




Music anytime, anywhere




Listen ad-free and on-demand with unlimited skips and offline playback.




Music anytime, anywhere




Listen ad-free and on-demand with unlimited skips and offline playback.
















Alexa, play Prime Music




Prime members can stream music on their Amazon Echo, Echo Dot, or Amazon Tap. Just ask.




Alexa, play Prime Music




Prime members can stream music on their Amazon Echo, Echo Dot, or Amazon Tap. Just ask.




Alexa, play Prime Music




Prime members can stream music on their Amazon Echo, Echo Dot, or Amazon Tap. Just ask.
















Two million songs and so much more




With a Prime membership, you can also enjoy Free Two-Day Shipping, streaming movies and TV shows, and more.




Two million songs and so much more




With a Prime membership, you can also enjoy Free Two-Day Shipping, streaming movies and TV shows, and more.




Two million songs and so much more




With a Prime membership, you can also enjoy Free Two-Day Shipping, streaming movies and TV shows, and more.
















Amazon Music Apps




Listen to Prime Music on all of your favorite devices.




See all supported devices




Amazon Music Apps




Listen to Prime Music on all of your favorite devices.




See all supported devices




Amazon Music Apps




Listen to Prime Music on all of your favorite devices.




See all supported devices
















Unlock more music with Amazon Music Unlimited




With Amazon Music Unlimited, unlock tens of millions of songs and weekly new releases - exclusive Prime pricing.




Learn More about Unlimited




Unlock more music with Amazon Music Unlimited




With Amazon Music Unlimited, unlock tens of millions of songs and weekly new releases - exclusive Prime pricing.




Learn More about Unlimited




Unlock more music with Amazon Music Unlimited




With Amazon Music Unlimited, unlock tens of millions of songs and weekly new releases - exclusive Prime pricing.




Learn More about Unlimited
















Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Try Prime
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Try Prime
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Try Prime
          

















There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started

















v























 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.


















Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


